_	Yet the ECJ stated that the rule that only "employees" could join the Teachers' Superannuation Scheme could well be incompatible with Article 141.
_	An Italian variant includes the rule that if the 7 is made with only two cards, the player who receives double their wager and becomes the dealer.
_	In 1834 Story referred to the theory that assignments under bankrupt or insolvent laws were, and ought to be, of universal operation to transfer movable property, in whatever country it might be situate, and concluded that there was great wisdom in adopting the rule that an assignment in bankruptcy should operate as a complete and valid transfer of all his movable property abroad, as well as at home, and for a country to prefer an attaching domestic creditor to a foreign assignee or to foreign creditors could 'hardly be deemed consistent with the general comity of nations …
_	Because the existing federal proceeds from the area affected by this bill are small, and because it is unclear whether the rule imposed by this bill would be more or less restrictive than the rule that OSM will impose under current law, CBO expects that firms in the coal industry would not significantly change their valuation of coal leases under the bill, and therefore, that enacting H.R. 2824 would have a negligible impact on the federal budget.
_	By analyzing the English errors children make (such as overgeneralizing morphological rules to create words like "mouses" and "bringed"), he concludes that irregular verbs are not remembered in terms of the rules that produce them (such as the rule that produces "sleep"/"slept", "weep"/"wept", "keep"/"kept", etc.), and instead have their past tenses memorized directly.
_	These norms were, however, largely redundant or dealing with matters reserved to the "Länder", and as such officially set out of force within two decades; aside from the Church articles, the rule that titles of nobility are to be considered part of the name and must no longer be bestowed (Art. 109 III) is the only one left in force.
_	Lately, the Ing Cup has been using an 8-point komi rule in their tournament, but with the rule that if the scores are equal after komi then Black wins, so this is equivalent to 7.5 points.
_	Here we usually add the rule that all of the original face planes must be present in the stellation, i.e. we do not consider partial stellations.
_	It is mainly notable for being the first instance of the rule that two witnesses are needed to prove a charge of treason, a rule which still exists today in the United States Constitution.
_	The representatives created the rule that each team is only allowed 15 plays per drive.
_	Oenopides apparently also was the author of the rule that geometrical constructions should use no other means than compass and straightedge.
_	Nevertheless, the subjective test is only applicable in the context of the ISA, and the rule that an objective test applies to subjectively worded powers continues to apply where statutes other than the ISA are concerned.
_	Now this Court has accepted the rule that when a contract has been reduced to writing, the writing is, in general, regarded as the exclusive memorial of the transaction and in a suit between the parties no evidence to prove its terms may be given save the document of secondary evidence of its contents, nor may the contents of such document be contradicted, altered, added to or varied by parol evidence.
_	This case is cited for the rule that in federal courts, a reporter may not generally avoid testifying in a criminal grand jury, and it remains the only case in which the U.S. Supreme Court has considered the use of "reporters' privilege".
_	The station's broadcasting license was surrendered to the FCC in 1986, and it was canceled indefinably as per the rule that if a station was silent for more than one calendar year, the station surrenders the broadcast license.
_	One attraction of the nominalistic program is that if it can be carried out it solves Plato's problem in Parmenides, since the need for a single idea or form or universal "green" then vanishes and it can be expunged through Occam's razor, i.e. the rule that, other things being equal, one should not multiply explanatory entities beyond necessity.
_	VERP depends on the recipients' MTAs following the rule that bounces are sent to the envelope sender.
_	The AME church also follows the rule that a minister of the denomination must retire at age 75, with bishops, more specifically, being required to retire upon the General Conference nearest their 75th birthday.
_	But before the playoffs, it was determined that one of their players, Sou Song Cun, was not of Chinese nationality, thus violating the rule that each team may only have two foreign players.
_	At that time in Korea it was the rule that the hospital dealt with the treatment of the patient, whereas the supply of the patient was his own problem.
_	re2c has "greedy" matching semantics: if multiple rules match, the rule that matches longer prefix is preferred; if the conflicting rules match the same prefix, the earlier rule has priority.
_	The "Rule of Two" of the title refers to the rule that there be only two Sith in existence at one time: a Master and an Apprentice, a rule that Bane originates.
_	Because of the late introduction of cable television in Europe, older television sets generally could not receive the special cable-only channels, so some countries (like Germany) still have the rule that the public TV stations must be located either in Band I or Band III.
_	A Pollock biographer wrote: "...[Tobey's] dense web of white strokes, as elegant as Oriental calligraphy, impressed Jackson so much that in a letter to Louis Bunce he described Tobey, a West Coast artist, as an 'exception' to the rule that New York was 'the only real place in America where painting (in the real sense) can come thru."
_	Random self-reducibility (RSR) is the rule that a good algorithm for the average case implies a good algorithm for the worst case.
_	To avoid the schism in the future, the Third Lateran Council in 1179 promulgated the decree "Licet de evitanda discordia", which established the rule that the Pope is elected with a majority of two thirds of the cardinals participating in the election.
_	These were the most well-known exceptions to the rule that magazines lasted only a few years.
_	In subsequent cases, the courts have interpreted the Sixteenth Amendment and the "Brushaber" decision as standing for the rule that the amendment allows income taxes on "wages, salaries, commissions, etc. without apportionment."
_	In order to employ this technique successfully, one must consider the observed point group symmetry of the measured faces and creatively apply the rule that "crystal morphologies are often combinations of simple (i.e. low multiplicity) forms where the individual faces have the lowest possible Miller indices for any given zone axis".
_	The top 24 gymnasts based on the preliminary results would qualify to compete in the all-around, because of the rule that only the top two qualifiers of each country would advance to the all-around competition, it appeared that Tomita would not continue to the all-around finals, with his teammates Uchimura and Sakamoto competing instead.
_	The Yaiba armor is unique, as it partially violates the rule that women can not be Makai Knights by causing the bearer to assume a female form while wearing it.
_	In "Kring v. Missouri" (1883), the Court held that it violated double jeopardy for a statute to attempt to abrogate the rule that a guilty plea to second degree murder is an implied acquittal for first-degree murder.
_	In this way the court recognised a limited exception to the rule that no claim for salvage be recognised by the courts outside the context of salvage in tidal waters.
_	A reverse painter's algorithm is sometimes used, in which objects nearest to the viewer are painted first — with the rule that paint must never be applied to parts of the image that are already painted (unless they are partially transparent).
_	The text in two locations follows the rule that two consecutive identical letters are represented by a single rune, even when the two identical letters are at the end of one word and the start of a second word.
_	However, the rule that the starting player gets to skip his first draw step was introduced in this tournament, and persisted.
_	The Bar enforces the rule that Mississippi lawyers must complete 12 credits each year.
_	In this case, the rule that at least two colors are used is relaxed and now every link has at least three 3-colorings (just color every arc the same color).
_	Among the contributions made by Yadin Dudai and his coworkers: identification of the first learning mutant, using Drosophila, which was a critical proof of concept for the neurogenetic analysis of memory; discovery of consolidation in the fruit fly, rendering it amenable to genetic analysis and demonstrating the universality of consolidation; dissociation of the effect of single gene mutations on encoding vs. consolidation; elucidation of the molecular machinery of memory encoding, memory consolidation and experimental extinction in the mammalian neocortex, using taste associations as a model; discovery of the rule that guides stability of associative memories after their retrieval (the "dominant trace" model); and the data-driven hypothesis that consolidations linger long after they have been considered to end, accounting for ongoing changes in the stability and veracity of memory.
_	Books of authority is a term used by legal writers to refer to a number of early legal textbooks that are excepted from the rule that textbooks (and all books other than statute or law report) are not treated as authorities by the courts of England and Wales and other common law jurisdictions.
_	For example, the rule that licenses the move from the implication 'if p then q' plus the assertion of its antecedent p, to the assertion of the consequent q is known as modus ponens (or 'mode of positing').
_	The Roman Catholic Church continues to recognize him as a saint, listing him as such in the February 14 entry in the Roman Martyrology, and authorizing liturgical veneration of him on February 14 in any place where that day is not devoted to some other obligatory celebration in accordance with the rule that on such a day the Mass may be that of any saint listed in the Martyrology for that day.
_	Eventually, the rule that Superman should be the only Kryptonian survivor was relaxed, allowing for a return of Kara Zor-El as his cousin.
_	These rules allow one boat to try to attack the other by getting the other boat penalized so that it has to do what is called three sixty (this is turning the boat three hundred and sixty degrees around or as the rule that states, one tack and one gibe in the same direction), which then puts the penalized boat at a large disadvantage compared to the others.
_	The sequence numbers always obey the rule that "n" ≤ "n" ≤ "n" ≤ "n" ≤ "n" + "w".
_	A notable exception to the rule that all orders are interlocutory until the final issue is resolved is the issue of unresolved attorney's fees.
_	As said, after this race the rule that mandated mechanics was never again applied.
_	Following his resignation, cardinals had questioned the rule that they delay starting the conclave until 15 days after the papacy fell vacant.
_	However, Ulpian, when he states the rule that one party cannot promise for another, makes an exception for heirs, which may mean that it was permissible.
_	Capitalization contravenes the rule that the initial letter of a unit name or its derivative shall be lower case in English.
_	Despite this vote, this proposal made it into the final legislation when the House–Senate conference committee passed a strengthened version of the rule that included the language prepared by Senators Merkley and Levin.
_	Lévi-Strauss also discovered that a wide range of historically unrelated cultures had the rule that individuals should marry their cross-cousin, meaning children of siblings of the opposite sex - from a male perspective that is either the FZD (father's sister's daughter) or the MBD (mother's brother's daughter).
_	Miñoso was then ejected after throwing his bat at Umont, but apologized profusely after the game, saying he was unaware of the rule that any pitch in that situation must be called a strike regardless of its location; he served a three-game suspension.
_	Lord Templeman viewed this would contradict the rule that someone should not be made liable to a contract when they have not been privy to it.
_	Justice McReynolds argued in his dissent that the Court has, at many times in the past, applied the rule that it may not review any question arising from a state court ruling unless it is shown that the question was determined in the state court or at least duly presented for such a determination.
_	By Graham's own admission, though, he was not an absolutist in the application of the rule that now bears his name: his autobiography relates a lunch meeting with Hillary Clinton that he initially refused on the grounds that he does not eat alone with women other than his wife, but she persuaded him that they could have a private conversation in a public dining room.
_	The process of deduction in the kal va-chomer is limited by the rule that the conclusion may contain nothing more than is found in the premise.
_	They are regarded as "royalty" by other vampires because they have lived for well over 3000 years and act as police, enforcing the rule that vampires' existence remain a secret from humans.
_	It also abolished the rule that treason trials in Scotland had to be conducted according to the rules of English criminal law.
_	After Rugland cleared waivers, the Lions attempted to sign Rugland to their practice squad, but the league rejected the signing, claiming that the rule that the Lions had used to allow the signing was no longer valid.
_	The mesencephalic nucleus is not a true nucleus; it is a sensory ganglion (like the trigeminal ganglion) embedded in the brainstem and the sole exception to the rule that sensory information passes through peripheral sensory ganglia before entering the central nervous system.
_	The runes for this phrase, raþisi, are carved on the serpent's tail and follow the rule that double consonants are represented with only a single consonant, even if one of the two consonants are at the end of one word and the second is at the beginning of the next word.
_	Switzerland is an exception to the rule that long-distance bus lines are established especially in countries with inadequate railway network, or in areas with low population density.
_	However, because the Germans laid down the rule that no rotor should be in the same position on successive days, if the previous days's rotors and their positions were known, this number was reduced to 32.
_	In organic chemistry, on water reactions are the exception to the rule that homogeneous reactions take place faster than heterogeneous reactions.
_	These rules were usually meant to avoid offending non-Jewish neighbors, and to maintain the rule that it was a smaller celebration than a wedding.
_	Here is an example: 100 infants are shown an object that appears to teleport, violating the rule that objects move in continuous paths.
_	Hebrew scholars reject the rule that "yôm" with a number or an "evening and morning" construct can only refer to 24-hour days.
_	On July 18, 1278, after consultation with the Cardinals, Nicholas had issued a bull, "Fundamenta militantis", instituting the rule that emperors, kings, princes, marquises, dukes, counts, and barons were ineligible for the office of Senator of Rome, and others were eligible for one-year terms only.
_	However, in Mabior the Supreme Court rejected the view that consent will always be vitiated by non-disclosure of HIV-positive status, substituting the rule that there will be no consent only if in addition to the non-disclosure there was a realistic possibility of transmission of HIV.
_	The 2006 NFL rule change allows NBC and the NFL to reassign game start times for Sunday games only, beginning in Week 11, although the NFL changed this clause to Week 5 in 2014 (with the rule that only two of the six possible Sunday night games could have reassigned start times).
_	Apart from the rule that such discretion is to be exercised judicially upon all the relevant facts, no rules should be prescribed to regulate that discretion, as such rules would inevitably curtail the court's discretion and negate or erode the plaintiff's right to select his remedy.
_	The puck deflects off a referee or linesman and goes directly into the goal (exception to the rule that a puck hitting a referee or a linesman is still live)
_	The only naming-convention that is still universally respected is the rule that electromagnetic radiation that is known to be of atomic nuclear origin is "always" referred to as "gamma rays", and never as X-rays.
_	The bout was fought at least partially under pro wrestling rules, with NJPW worker Teruo Takahashi as the referee and the rule that every fighter would have to release any hold if his opponent grabbed the ropes.
_	One of the most noticeable differences between HTML and XHTML is the rule that "all tags must be closed": empty HTML tags such as codice_2 must either be "closed" with a regular end-tag, or replaced by a special form: (the space before the 'codice_3' on the end tag is optional, but frequently used because it enables some pre-XML Web browsers, and SGML parsers, to accept the tag).
_	This number of teams continued until 1946, while the rule that allowed the participation of three imported players per team, was suspended from 1942 to 1944.
_	Another exception to the rule that performing a pre-existing contractual duty is not valid consideration for a new agreement was created in "Williams v Roffey Bros & Nicholls (Contractors) Ltd" [1991] 1 QB 1 which decided that in such situations the court will be quick to find consideration, if "practical benefits" are given from one to another party.
_	The system examined chemical substances and all of their most likely reactions and correlates the expected taste and related acidity or saltiness according to the rule that acids and bases produce salts.
_	King asked the reason he said "oh king i am jain, i am bounded by the rule that i can't eat food without worshipping jain idol, so i went 30 km away (present day kamptee jain mandir) for worship.
_	The Bar enforces the rule that Montana lawyers must complete 15 credits each year.
_	A continuous spacing (logical 0) condition violates the rule that every valid character has to end with one or more logic 1 (marking) "stop" bits.
_	However, "Spin" felt the album "doesn't reverse the rule that actors make dubious pop musicians" and "Entertainment Weekly" criticized its "cloying, gothic preciousness".
_	"Banks", read together with "Wheaton", on which it relies, stands for the rule that the "law" "is not subject to copyright."
_	It is the rule that:
_	This is one of the few exceptions to the rule that the name of an array is converted to a pointer to the first element of the array, and is possible just because the actual array size is fixed and known at compile time, when the "sizeof" operator is evaluated.
_	For example, if we solve the RBB puzzle backwards, then this is the same as solving the RRB puzzle in the regular forward direction (note: the Blue and Red colors have been swapped to keep the rule that at the start of the puzzle all disks must be on the source post with their Red side facing up).
_	This is done either by statutory enactment, as by Part VIII of the Merchant Shipping Act 1804, which deals with the liability of ship-owners—or by established rules of "common law", as, for instance, the rule that the common carrier is absolutely responsible for the safe delivery of the goods carried, unless prevented by an act of God or enemies of the Queen.
_	All of the royal commission's recommendations were passed into law, and one consequence of the rule that those holding high command should be bilingual was to give French-Canadian officers something of a monopoly on high command for a generation as most French-Canadian officers were fluent in English while most English-Canadian officers were not fluent in French.
_	Various principles are included within the act, such the rule that individual has the right to retrieve the data collected about them at any time under certain conditions.
_	Some people play by the rule that the drawing of trumps can only begin when the player drawing trumps already has a void suit or when trump has been broken (i.e. a trump card has already been played), some play by the rule that drawing can be done at any point in the game, while most play by the rule that trumps can only be drawn when the trump suit has been broken.
_	After serving as associate justice, Currey became Chief Justice on January 1, 1866, when Silas Sanderson resigned, on the rule that the member of the court with the shortest remaining term serves.
_	If formula_54 is the rule that assigns a winner among two candidates given their relative orders in the votes, then the probability that there is a Condorcet winner given a uniformly random vote is formula_122, from which the theorem easily follows.
_	After the conclusion of this season, the NCAA reinstated the rule that freshmen were ineligible to play on varsity teams, and they would remain ineligible until the 1972-73 season.
_	With regard to the meaning of words which are pointed in the text, Simeon ben Eleazar laid down the rule that if the pointed part of the word (נקודה) is equal to the unpointed part (כתב) in length, the word must not be interpreted at all; but if one part is longer than the other, such part must be interpreted (Genesis Rabbah lxxviii.).
_	D has, however, been constrained in its design by the rule that any code that is legal in both C and D should behave in the same way.
_	Liberal Democrat MP Matthew Taylor accused the Conservative Party of using the appointment in a bid to get around the rule that requires MPs to limit the local cases they take up to their own constituency, by claiming that party political activity by MPs outside their own constituencies was in the role of "Shadow Minister" for the areas concerned, despite there being no actual Minister to shadow.
_	After several years, Slovakia established the rule that summer time begins in the last weekend of March (during the night from Saturday to Sunday) and ends in the last weekend of September.
_	"Stichzwang" means "trick compulsion" and is the rule that players must attempt to win the trick if they are able, either by playing a higher card of the led suit or by playing a trump card.
_	Also a point system was introduced to make a ranking, but the rule that if one won three distances became automatic World champion was still valid.
_	Nonetheless, "Shuanggui" was introduced in 1990 in order to get around the rule that public security departments can detain suspects for no more than 24 hours.
_	Furthermore, if the shooter (who could not be found), were to be held liable, he would only have to pay the losses he caused Mr Baker by the shooting, not by the earlier car accident (because of the rule that "the defendant must take the plaintiff as he finds him").
_	It is one of the exceptions to the rule that activities prohibited on Shabbat are likewise prohibited on Yom Tov.)
_	In 1905 Hénard proposed the rule that at busy intersections the vehicles on the right had the right of way.
_	Domineering would not be classified as an impartial game as players use differently acting pieces, one player with vertical dominoes, one with horizontal ones, thereby breaking the rule that each player must be able to act using the same operations.
_	Native listeners of Western music contradicted this view; Swedish critic Dan Backman of "Svenska Dagbladet" said that Paparizou was no exception to the rule that musical artists sound better in their native languages, describing her vocal performances as "expressive" in Greek and "bland" in English.
_	The only crossing of the canal was a plank bridge some distance back from New Year Trench and although the rule that a topographical feature going through a position should not be used as a unit boundary was followed, only a platoon of the 10th Battalion, Lancashire Fusiliers held the Bluff, the rest of the battalion being on the south bank.
_	Frogs, which because of their intolerance for saltwater are assumed to have descended from ancestors that broke off from Gondwana, are one of the few exceptions to the rule that amphibians are never found on oceanic islands (another being the frogs of Fiji).
_	After Queen Victoria introduced the rule that military kilts should have a way of fastening The Black Watch chose to use Ribbons rather than a pin.
_	In 1928, Mary Ambrose Smith, who was selected as Queen, was found to have secretly married Dr. Thomas Birdsall days earlier, violating the rule that the Queen of Love and Beauty must be a "maiden."
_	Jurin fostered international observational research into weather and meteorology and studied the phenomenon of capillary action, deriving the rule that the height of liquid in a capillary tube is inversely proportional to the diameter of the tube at the surface of the liquid only, a law sometimes known as Jurin's law.
_	In 1927 the "Mining Act" was issued, which gave the ownership of the subsoil to the State and imposed the rule that any oil-related activity was subject to authorization and / or government grant.
_	Felthouse v Bindley (1862) EWHC CP J 35, is the leading English contract law case on the rule that one cannot impose an obligation on another to reject one's offer.
_	also obtained directly from the diagram with the rule that any two unit vectors on a straight line are connected by multiplication to the third unit vector on that straight line with signs according to the arrows (sign of the permutation that orders the unit vectors).
_	Civil law differed from most other codes of law in the rule that on a landowner's death his land was to be shared equally between his sons, legitimate and illegitimate.
_	Hojs also stated that they will remain committed to the rule that no single shareholder can own more than 20% of stock in the company.
_	He allowed no exceptions for cardinals to the rule that bishops must take up residence in their sees, and designated a committee to update the Index of Forbidden Books.
_	Relying upon the rule that the scope of a patent "must be limited to the invention described in the claims,"Motion Picture Patents", the Court held that the attempted restriction on use of unpatented supplies was improper because it expanded the patent monopoly beyond the scope of the claims and the patent law.
_	[B]ecause Westinghouse has, in effect, burdened Mitsubishi with its foreign patent licenses, thus tying it to Westinghouse technology, Westinghouse should now be required to license its United States patents to Mitsubishi, so that Mitsubishi can compete in the United States . . . flies in the face of the rule that a holder of United States patents has a right to refuse to license them.
_	It established the rule that prevents parties from discharging an obligation by part performance, affirming "Pinnel's Case" (1602) 5 Co Rep 117a.
_	One of the biggest differences for the officials proved to be the rule that required all officials to wear protective helmets while on ice, and this marked the only time in Scapinello's career that he wore one (he was included under a grandfather clause in the NHL; he retired before the clause was revoked and helmets became mandatory for all officials in the 2006-07 season).
_	First, the rule that "multiple effects resolve simultaneously unless a conflict arises" was changed to "effects always resolve ".
_	Halilhodžić, who was 26 at the time, took advantage of the rule that allowed two players over the age of 21 to participate – hence him and Velimir Zajec (who had also already debuted for Yugoslavia full squad in 1977) were the two senior players brought in to strengthen the under-21 squad.
_	There are several exceptions to the rule that penalties apply to distributions before age 59½.
_	Many exceptions may be applied at common law to the rule that the first finder of lost property has a superior claim of right over any other person except the previous owner.
_	When the lawyers advised him that no one had, he stated the rule that lawyers had a constitutional right to cuss the judge and, since Mr. Trigg didn't know he had been heard, he was not going to be fined.
_	The person giving the penalty must state what the incorrect action was, without explaining the rule that was broken.
_	This includes the rule that the potentially possessed individual must be evaluated by a medical professional before any other acts are taken.
_	Bar enforces the rule that Utah lawyers must complete 24 credits of Continuing Legal Education every two years.
_	These include the rule that a masculine plural must be used for any group with at least one male; the use of the masculine definite article for infinitives (e.g. "el amar", not "la amar"); and the permissibility of using Spanish male pronouns for female referents but not vice versa (e.g. "el que" includes women, "la que" does not include men).
_	Throughout this entire time, the women fiercely upheld the rule that the magazine would be written exclusively for, and read exclusively by, the members of the club.
_	As directed by Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the SEC adopted the rule that is now Item 308, requiring subject companies to include in their annual reports a report of management on the company's internal control over financial reporting.
_	The 1648 Peace of Westphalia, which ended the Thirty Years' War, established the rule that prisoners of war should be released without ransom at the end of hostilities and that they should be allowed to return to their homelands.
_	The authors of the plurality opinion emphasized that stare decisis had to apply in "Casey" because the "Roe" rule had not been proven intolerable; the rule had become subject "to a kind of reliance that would lend a special hardship to the consequences of overruling and add inequity to the cost of repudiation"; the law had not developed in such a way around the rule that left the rule "no more than a remnant of abandoned doctrine"; and the facts had not changed, nor viewed differently, to "rob the old rule of significant application or justification."
_	The two main common law exceptions to the rule that hearsay is inadmissible are "res gestae" and confessions.
_	Lastly, the rule that must occur with front vowels and with back vowels can be broken when either or in suffix-initial position becomes assimilated by the other due to the preceding consonant being such.
_	The Court found a way around the lack of privity between the consumer and the packager by adopting the rule that a party who puts falsely labeled poison into the market and thus "puts human life in imminent danger" should respond in damages to the ultimate consumer.
_	The Domicile and Matrimonial Proceedings Act 1973 abolished the rule that a married woman had the domicile of her husband (with transitional rules for those married before 1 January 1974), as well as reforming the rules dealing with the domicile of minors.
_	For the most part, alt.fan.warlord targeted sigs that violated a principle of Usenet netiquette known as the "McQuary limit" — i.e., the rule that a sig should be less than 80 columns wide (preferably 72 or less), and no longer than four lines.
_	Though many of the most influential liberal thinkers, especially John Stuart Mill, believed in multiple exceptions to the rule that "laissez faire" was the best policy, the courts were suspicious of interfering in agreements, whoever the parties were.
_	The same principle appears in the rule that she could not be endowed of a castle maintained for the defense of the realm and not for the private use of the owner.
_	He obtained from Pope John Paul II dispensation from the rule that all cardinals be ordained bishops.
_	This does not require the rule that the contest be fair to each.
_	Alexander and Louis II introduced primogeniture, the rule that the whole of the principality would henceforth be inherited by the eldest son.
_	But, Nvidia cannot use this infrastructure because it uses a technical means to enforce the rule that it can only be used by LKMs that are also GPL.
_	In 2014, Dickinson & Christidis cited the rule that the species group epithet is invariable, so the species name was changed back to the spelling used in the original description as "spilonota".
_	There are currently no opposition members in the National Assembly, partially because of the rule that the party or coalition with a majority vote in each district wins all of that district's seats .
_	The runes on U 614 that indicate that "he was sick," hnusiok, follow the rule that double consonants are represented with only a single consonant, even if one of the two consonants are at the end of one word and the second is at the beginning of the next word.
_	By the bull "Ad conditorem canonum" of 8 December 1322, John XXII declared it ridiculous to pretend that every scrap of food given to the friars and eaten by them belonged to the pope, refused to accept ownership over the goods of the Franciscans in future and granted them exemption from the rule that absolutely forbade ownership of anything even in common, thus forcing them to accept ownership.
_	For many years it had been the rule that every child given 'force' spirit stones would be conscripted.
_	Obviously, the rule that forbids falling from the platform is not in use in this part of the round.
_	Finally, Cao took the title King of Wei in 216 CE, violating the rule that only Liu family members could become kings, yet he never deposed Emperor Xian.
_	No two homes are alike due to the rule that all homes had to be designed individually by an architect, and notable designers such as Paul Williams and Robert Byrd contributed to the neighborhood.
_	Jonathan Parker LJ held that there was a clear breach of the rule that directors must avoid a conflict of interest.
_	After discarding the rule that prevented foreigners from representing Benfica, they signed their first one, Jorge Gomes.
_	The Viceroyalty of New Spain made an exception to the rule that no California mission was to be established within seven miles of any pueblo in Las Californias, as Lompoc was so small.
_	Second, even if the devise might be construed as a "future devise", the interest was too remote under the rule that a future interest must take effect within the lifetime of a life in being at the time of the deviser's death, (or within 9 months thereafter, in the event of an unborn heir).
_	It substantially reformed the benefits system and abolished the rule that those claiming benefits must genuinely be seeking work.
_	Centuries later, the region around Salerno was the only exception to the rule that (except for skipping units that had regionally fallen out of use) the apothecaries' ounce was subdivided down to the scruple in exactly the same way as in the Roman system:
_	The Bar enforces the rule that New Hampshire lawyers must complete 12 credits of Continuing Legal Education each year.
_	The word teruah (a broken sound) appears three times in the Bible in the context of the shofar, from which the Talmud derives the rule that three such sounds must be made.
_	In 1961, the Court extended the rule that applied in federal courts to state courts.
_	The judge told him: "You are no exception to the rule that theatrical careers do not last long, and yours already has been a long one."
_	Hamilton showed that animals such as workers could be expected to provide assistance to relatives such as their queens according to the costs and benefits involved (K) and their degree of genetic relatedness (r), and gave the rule that now carries his name, K > 1/r.
_	Now this Court has accepted the rule that when a contract has been reduced to writing, the writing is, in general, regarded as the exclusive memorial of the transaction and in a suit between the parties no evidence to prove its terms may be given save the document or secondary evidence of its contents, nor may the contents of such document be contradicted, altered, added to or varied by parol evidence.
_	In 1983, it was raised to 28 matches, including the rule that the goalkeeper had to play at least 60 minutes in match for it to count.
_	However, "Burning" did not appear on the UK Singles Chart because of the rule that primary artists can have only three concurrent entries.
_	These principles ranged from standard rules of logic (e.g., "a fortiori" argument [known in Hebrew as קל וחומר —  "kal v'chomer"]) to more expansive ones, such as the rule that a passage could be interpreted by reference to another passage in which the same word appears (Gezerah Shavah).
_	SBNM enforces the rule that New Mexico lawyers must complete 12 credits of Continuing Legal Education each year.
_	The Chinese stated that married women were "more physically and psychologically mature" and that the rule that they had have had children was because of concerns that spaceflight would harm their reproductive organs (which includes embryos).
_	One reason for this is the rule that in such cases the evidence for the prosecution must be corroborated in order to permit a conviction.
_	Among the European standards of racing the IBMXF observed is the rule that racers must stay within their lanes until out of the gate.
_	The final in ("tàngr") is similar but nasalized, because of the rule that the is deleted and the syllable is nasalized.
_	Soon after, in "Connell v MIB" [1969], a case with materially similar facts, Lord Denning (violating the rule that the Court of Appeal was bound by its own decisions) said, "I am not satisfied by the decision in "Coward".
_	In both cases, the Marshall Court continued to apply the rule that aboriginal title was inalienable, except to The Crown.
_	The runes suno on the stone, which translate as "sons at," follow the rule that double letters are represented with only a single letter, even if one of the two letters are at the end of one word and the second is at the beginning of the next word.
_	The Council of Trent (Sess. XXIII, chap. xvi on Reform) lays down the rule that "no cleric who is a stranger shall without letter commendatory from his own ordinary be admitted by any bishop to celebrate the divine mysteries".
_	Over the 19th century, most states in the North adhered to the rule that the period by which an employee was paid (a week, a month or a year) determined the period of notice that should be given before a dismissal was effective.
_	During this term, he moved to repeal the rule that excluded anti-slavery petitions and spoke upon the loan and bankrupt bills, and the army.
_	Levi-Strauss also discovered that a wide range of historically unrelated cultures had the rule that individuals should marry their cross-cousin, meaning children of siblings of the opposite sex - from a male perspective that is either the FZD (father's sister's daughter in kinship abbreviation) or the MBD (mother's brother's daughter in kinship abbreviation).
_	"The New York Times"' Kelefa Sanneh described him as "a wounded hero beating the odds" and it "gave him a chance to prove that he was the exception to the rule that producers can't rap."
_	The Taiwanese winners of the Far East series, and the Dominican winners of the Latin American series were disqualified before the Little League World Series; the Taiwanese for fielding a team that was the only one competing at a school of 2,100 students, in contravention of the rule that requires schools of over 1,000 to field at least four teams per age group if they are to be represented in the Little League World Series, and the Dominicans for using players who failed residency and age requirements.
_	Like surrogates, the rule that these cannot be used is often ignored, although the operation of the byte order mark assumes that U+FFFE will never be the first code point in a text.
_	Since it was not revealed until #389 that Dredd and Fargo shared the same DNA, and therefore (presumably) the same features, the rule that Dredd's face is never shown in the comic did not yet apply to Fargo.
_	The first exception to the rule that a person must be dead before succession can occur, is where a court pronounces a presumption of death and makes an order for the division of the estate.
_	Because it is possible that the deceased might still be alive, this case constitutes an exception to the rule that he or she must be dead before succession can occur.
_	One might further have supposed that the rule that Levites were disqualified by age obtained even at Shiloh and at the Temple at Jerusalem, where the Levites sang in the choir and guarded the doors of the Temple.
_	Maxwell Montes, Alpha Regio, and Beta Regio are the three exceptions to the rule that the surface features of Venus are to be named for females.
_	It was formerly the rule that the heads of all Curial Congregations must be cardinals, and until the later 20th century they were titled pro-prefects until they were raised to that dignity.
_	Some legal systems have now abrogated by statute the rule that as against third parties the transaction may be void if it has insufficient commercial benefit to the company.
_	Hillel the Elder, in the first century BCE, used the rule that remittance of debts applies only to debts between Jews, to develop a device known as Prosbul in which the debt is transferred to a Beit Din (religious court).
_	The institute was set to follow the rule of Saint Francis of Assisi - the rule that Pope Nicholas IV approved in 1289.
_	The non-zero denominator in the case using a fraction to represent division is an example of the rule that division by zero is undefined.
_	Alain Peyrefitte, Minister of Information, decided to enact the rule that rival candidates will dispose of the same amount of time to speak.
_	When Rav Dimi came from the Land of Israel to Babylonia, he taught that the rule that one may violate any commandment except idolatry, prohibited sexual relations, and murder to stay alive applied only when there is no royal decree forbidding the practice of Judaism.
_	The second is the rule that the speed of light is the same for every observer.
_	Only three 'exceptions' to the rule that the border follows the river (from source to sea) currently exist, all of which are upstream of the confluence of the River Deer, in the upper course of the Tamar.
_	These "n" must conform to the rule that "n" + "n" + ... + "n" = "n" (i.e. that the total sample size is given by the sum of the sub-sample sizes).
_	Justice Clarence Thomas is the major exception to the rule that Justices hire clerks from elite schools; he takes pride in selecting clerks from non-top-tier schools, and publicly noted that his clerks have been attacked on the Internet as "third tier trash."
_	There are few exceptions, however, to the rule that with increasing age sedimentary rocks become more and more indurated, and the older they are the more likely it is that they will have the firm consistency generally implied in the term "rock".
_	Usually the design applies some transform to a simple ladder topology: the resulting topology is ladder-like but no longer obeys the rule that shunt admittances are the dual network of series impedances: it invariably becomes more complex with higher component count.
_	For example, from 2009 through 2011, MARPA's President (Jason Dickstein) served on the FAA Aviation Rulemaking Committee (ARC) for Safety Management Systems (SMS), and MARPA played a significant role in helping to craft a version of the rule that would most effectively promote safety.
_	Among its distinguishing features is the lack of any formal divider between the two halves and the rule that the ball is allowed to bounce as many times as desired.
_	The exemptions in favor of other moneyed capital appear to be of such a substantial character in amount as to take the present case out of the operation of the rule that it is not absolute equality that is contemplated by the act of Congress; a rule which rests upon the ground that exact uniformity or equality of taxation cannot, in the nature of things, be expected or attained under any system.
_	Former Indian wicket-keeper Farokh Engineer about the rule that the "it's absolutely daft", and it "doesn't make any sense".
_	It concerns the rule that shares should not be issued "at a discount" on the price at which they were issued.
_	It established the rule that privity of contract coupled with lack of consideration preclude third-party suit for breach of a contract and an exception to the rule in appropriate close family relationships.
_	In 1961, the Court extended the rule that applied in federal courts to state courts.
_	In his "A Dictionary of Modern English Usage" of 1926, H. W. Fowler derided those who prescribed against the inanimate "whose", writing: "in the starch that stiffens English style one of the most effective ingredients is the rule that "whose" shall refer only to persons"; he asserted that the alternative adds flexibility to style and proclaimed:
_	In both languages, identifiers consist of letters and digits, with the rule that the first character may not be a digit.
_	The first open rebellion against Amanullah's rule came from the Shinwari tribe who were angered by the imposition of various laws, including the requirement to wear European dress, the rule that required them to send a quota of their daughters to Kabul for education and the impositions of taxes (they had never previously paid tax).
_	However, in the second stage their systems contained the rule that they should use the bare infinitive form to express present action, without a separate rule for the use of "-ing".
_	Breaking the rule that PISA must not be used for school-level evaluation (for which it is methodologically not suited), the media were informed and the Helene-Lange-School was announced Germany's best school.
_	The Gemara of the tractate is noteworthy as precursors to the development of common law principles, for example the presumption of innocence and the rule that a criminal conviction requires the concurrence of twelve.
_	Given that most clubs in those days were district 'feeder' clubs (e.g. Coffs Harbour and District Soccer Club, Sawtell District Soccer Club, Urunga District Soccer Club), and the competition encompassed a truly representative area - including Taree, Wauchope, two Port Macquarie teams, Kempsey, Urunga, Sawtell, Nambucca, Coffs Harbour, Woolgoolga and some seasons as far afield as Armidale and Grafton - the rule that clubs must provide two teams was seen as a logical requirement in those days.
_	Further that each of these officers might be the greater check on the other, Ahmad Shah I enforced the rule that when the governor was chosen from among the royal slaves the accountant should be a free man, and that when the accountant was a slave the district governor should be chosen from some other class.
_	In particular, the rule that solvent and solute elements must have the same crystal structure does not seem to apply, as Fe, Ni, Cr, Co, and Mn have 4 different crystal structures as pure elements (and when the elements are present in equal concentrations, there can be no meaningful distinction between "solvent" and "solute" elements).
_	No team was promoted from the 2017 I.F.C. due to the rule that no reserve side who wins the I.F.C. (in this case Na Fianna 'B') can be promoted to the S.F.C.
_	There is also the rule that the champion must break and eat their eggs to prove they are not a fake.
_	Prior to the 1954–55 season, the NBA established the rule that a backcourt foul would result in a "three to make two" situation (up to three attempts to make two free throws) if the violating team was over the team foul limit.
_	The Mir was protected from insolvency by the rule that the families cannot be deprived of their houses or implements necessary for agriculture; nor can the Mir be deprived of its land.
_	"The case therefore raises a fundamental point of principle in the law of contractual damages: is the rule that a party may recover losses which were foreseeable ("not unlikely") an external rule of law, imposed upon the parties to every contract in default of express provision to the contrary, or is it a prima facie assumption about what the parties may be taken to have intended, no doubt applicable in the great majority of cases but capable of rebuttal in cases in which the context, surrounding circumstances or general understanding in the relevant market shows that a party would not reasonably have been regarded as assuming responsibility for such losses?"
_	Starting with the 2010–11 bowl season, the rule that required the selection of seven-win teams before any 6–6 teams was eliminated.
_	The practice of celebrating the Eucharist over the graves of martyrs is probably the origin of the rule that demanded that every altar must contain the relics of martyrs.
_	In addition, the rule that the challenging boat had to sail on her own bottom to the site of the match was eliminated, permitting boats to be shipped to the venue without requiring them to be able to sail across oceans (or contain living accommodations).
_	Courier Final Draft is supplied with screenwriting program Final Draft for use in writing screenplays, as it provides 55 lines per page which coincides with the rule that a screenplay page is approximately one minute of screen time.
_	This was later replaced, in "Re Beaglehole", with the rule that no fixed period of absence is required.
_	This is an exception to the rule that a criminal defendant cannot normally be compelled to furnish information to the prosecution.
_	In 1993, the rule that a husband could not rape his wife, the so-called marital rape exemption, was abolished; the presumption that a boy is incapable of committing rape was abolished in 1987.
_	In general, the rule that assigns higher priority to jobs with shorter expected processing time is optimal for the flowtime objective under the following assumptions: when all the job processing time distributions are exponential; when all the jobs have a common general processing time distribution with a nondecreasing hazard rate function; and when job processing time distributions are stochastically ordered.
_	After the poll crashed due to attracting too much traffic, "Time" removed O'Brien from the running, restating the rule that "whimsical candidates will not be counted."
_	It also abandoned the use of biases and instead added the rule that only the shortest possible encoding is allowed; the additional loss in compactness is relatively insignificant, but readers now have to look out for invalid encodings to avoid reliability and especially security issues.
_	In Canadian employment law, in those jurisdictions where a remedy for unjust dismissal is not available, it has long been the rule that reinstatement is not a remedy available to either the employer or the employeedamages must be paid instead.
_	Philo called the rule that a judge should not receive the testimony of a single witness "an excellent commandment."
_	This was subject to the rule that first publication could be simultaneous in more than one country; and thus copyright protection in the UK was obtained if publication occurred in the UK within one month of first publication abroad.
_	They noted, however, that the presidential race appeared to be an exception to the rule that the candidate spending the most money won.
_	The "Union Cycliste Internationale" (UCI) introduced the rule that a cycling race could not span three weekends.
_	From the expression "be-miksat" (Ex. xii. 4), which, according to it, can mean only "number," the older halakha deduces the rule that when killing the Passover lamb the slaughterer must be aware of the number of persons who are about to partake of it (Mek., Bo, 3 [ed. I.H. Weiss, p. 5a]).
_	Journal-isms is a rare exception to the rule that ‘you can never find it all in one place.’
_	For example, there may be a string formula_13 in the set formula_14 which, because of the rule that formula_15 must not appear next to formula_16, reduces to the string formula_17.
_	In the school Samuel held a position of authority; to him is ascribed the rule that during the heat of the day instruction should be suspended (Lam. R. i. 3, end; Midr. Teh. to Ps. xci. 6).
_	The 2011 elections saw the PPP won the largest number of seats (32), but fail to achieve a majority; however, although opposition parties held a majority of seats, the rule that the head of the largest party becomes President allowed new PPP leader Donald Ramotar to assume the position.
_	The most conspicuous exception to the rule that each phoneme is written with its own letter is the vowel "u", which is consistently written with the digraph ႭჃ 〈oü〉, for example ႮႭჃႰႨ 〈p’oüri〉 "p’uri" "bread".
_	The company failed to follow the rule that requires commercial e-mailers of sexually explicit material to use the phrase "sexually explicit" in the subject line.
_	The report of 1939 stated with regard to language that 'the school enforced rigidly the rule that no language but English might be used in school time'.
_	Reflex principles are presumptions to be applied in cases of doubt, such as the rule that where the moral right to something is unclear the law favours the person in possession.
_	And second, the rule that documents only need to be disclosed when an issue is raised is in tune with county court rule O 14 R 8(1).
_	This is not truly an exception to vowel harmony itself; rather, it is an exception to the rule that "a" denotes a front vowel.
_	Subsequent legislation, such as the Transport Act 1968, which defined the government's obligations to the maintenance of the inland waterways for which it was now responsible, did not include any commitment to maintain towpaths for use by anyone, however, some ten years later British Waterways started to relax the rule that a permit was required to give access to a towpath, and began to encourage leisure usage by walkers, anglers and in some areas, cyclists.
_	Swapping among three parties often helps satisfy tastes when trying to get around the rule that money is not allowed.
_	This effect is offset somewhat, however, by the rule that a player must win three rounds to win a game.
_	In January 2007, thanks to the success of the coach Claudio Borghi in the bench of Colo-Colo, the reserve team again was founded thanks to Gabriel Ruíz–Tagle's management, playing again in the third level of the Chilean football league system, but after another problem that affected in the reserve's team existence was the ANFA's controversial that established the rule that prevented to the filial teams in play at the Third division.
_	An example of use of "ijma" is the rule that zakah is "obligatory on golden assets at the same rate as it is on silver", (i.e. one fourth of a tenth) despite the fact that only silver had zakat ordered upon it by a hadith of Muhammad.
_	exception to the rule that the titles of Stevens's poems are not
_	Together, they defy the rule that the Games must have one victor, unintentionally inciting a rebellion against the authoritarian government of Panem.
_	This is a forward declaration, an exception to the rule that things must be declared before they are used.
_	2000 also marked the year that the concept of a loud side and a quiet side was replaced by the rule that large scale sound camps would be placed at the 10:00 and 2:00 edges, facing out into the deep playa.
_	Avicenna argues that this aggregate, too, must obey the rule that applies to a single contingent thing; in other words, it must have something outside itself that causes it to exist.
_	He was named to the American League All-Star Team, albeit many attribute the selection being a result of the rule that one player per team must appear in the All-Star Game.
_	This was the Court's year 1920 interpretation of the "Compensation Clause", the rule that Federal judges "shall, at stated Times, receive for their Services a Compensation, which shall not be diminished during their Continuance in Office" under Article III, section 1 of the U.S. Constitution.
_	That led to a disciplinary hearing under the rule that a civil servant should not publicly criticize the government’s policies.
_	The B188 also featured a longer, sleeker looking nose section to take advantage of the rule that would come in from that meant the drivers feet had to be behind the front axle line.
_	One day while helping her father clean the city premises outside a temple, little Ganga(princess Kamal), enters the inner chamber of the temple and incurs the priest's wrath for breaking the rule that untouchables can not enter temples.
_	LC gave a general background to the rule that there be no clogs on the equity of redemption and remarked,
_	In such a case the preferred rule(s) will be implemented autonomously in the relevant domain, while the agents in the other domain will choose the rule that maximizes their payoffs in response to their institutional environment.
_	There are exceptions to the rule that a person is bound by his or her signature, including fraud, misrepresentation and "non est factum".
_	Article 49 of the PRC Law on Protection of Consumer's Rights and Interests enacted on October 31, 1993, provides the rule that any consumer is entitled to a recovery of double the purchase price of products or service from the seller or service provider against their defraud.
_	It abolished the rule that all legal proeceedings automatically came to an end on the death of the monarch.
_	After turning eighty in October 2003, Silvestrini was a principal critic of the rule that only cardinals under the age of eighty can vote in a conclave.
_	In my opinion, the fact that the club put aside the rule that no player should receive more than four pounds a week...
_	Between 1962 and 1974, Congress passed nine copyright acts extending the copyright one or two years each time (these acts also introduced the rule that rounds the copyright term up to the end of that calendar year).
_	A language-user's following a rule correctly is not justified by any fact that obtains about the relationship between his candidate application of a rule in a particular case, and the putative rule itself (as for Hume the causal link between two events "a" and "b" is not determined by any particular fact obtaining between them "taken in isolation"), but rather the assertion that the rule that is being followed is justified by the fact that the behaviors surrounding the candidate instance of rule-following (by the candidate rule-follower) meet the expectations of other language users.
_	The game takes a generally humorous look at the genre and encourages joking and ludicrous, boisterous behavior among the players, the chief of which is the rule that whenever the name of the kobolds' king, Torg (All Hail King Torg!), is mentioned, all present are required to loudly proclaim, ""ALL HAIL KING TORG!"
_	In the classical era, the main form of artificial milk was almond milk, so the classical rabbis imposed the rule that almonds must be placed around such milk; in the Middle Ages, there was some debate about whether this had to be done during cooking as well as eating, or whether it was sufficient to merely do this during the meal.
_	Sets produced since 1970 or so have uniformly adopted the rule that scouts can move and strike in the same turn.
_	In case of "Fontaine v. British Columbia (Official Administrator)" the Court rejected the use of "res ipsa loquitur" and instead proposed the rule that once the plaintiff has proven that the harm was under exclusive control of the defendant and that they were not contributorily negligent a tactical burden is placed on the defendant in which the judge has the discretion to infer negligence unless the defendant can produce evidence to the contrary.
_	However, some ten years later British Waterways started to relax the rule that a permit was required to give access to a towpath, and began to encourage leisure usage by walkers, anglers and in some areas, cyclists.
_	The race was however, controversial, as the German Stroke subsequently left Cambridge before his course was finished, contravening the rule that all Boat Race participants must be genuine students undertaking academic courses which they intend to complete.
_	It repeated the rule that any Catholic who failed for over a month to denounce a priest who had made such advances in connection with confession was automatically excommunicated and could be absolved only after actually denouncing the priest to the Ordinary of the place or to the Holy Congregation of the Holy Office, or at least promising seriously to do so.
_	He competed all 6 events in qualifications but did not advance to the all-around individual event final due to the rule that only 2 gymnasts from each country can advance to an individual event final, as Philipp Boy and Marcel Nguyen both qualified ahead of Hambüchen.
_	The Tanakh contains the rule that Jewish slaves would be released following six years of service, but that non-Jewish slaves (barring a long list of conditions including conversion, or disability) could potentially be held indefinitely.
_	However, while one official signaled the interception, the other official signaled a touchdown for Seattle by receiver Golden Tate, based on the rule that a catch with simultaneous possession is ruled a completion for the offense.
_	The Vermont court's decision not only breaks with the rule that a tribe must consent to extinguishment of its aboriginal title, but also rejects the requirement that the dominant sovereign must express its intent to extinguish title with a "plain and unambiguous action."
_	In April 1989, through the leadership of Secretary General Borislav Stanković, FIBA approved the rule that allowed NBA players to compete in international tournaments, including the Olympics.
_	Over hundreds of vendors sell produce, baked goods, soaps, lotions, art, jewelry, pottery, and other crafts under the rule that you must: "Make it, bake it, or grow it".
_	A header is the only option when the ball is in air, because of the rule that a player can’t make contact with the ball using their hands.
_	The westbound street, contrary to the rule that even numbered streets typically go east, starts on the Upper East Side at York Avenue opposite Rockefeller University.
_	Starting from only one simple assumption about the rule that the orbits must obey, the Bohr model was able to relate the observed spectral lines in the emission spectrum of hydrogen to previously known constants.
_	After the reign of the Emperor Yingzong of Ming, it became the rule that only jinshi holders could enter the Hanlin Academy.
_	A married couple in 2010, whose total income was just shy of $21,500, but who had more than $3,100 of investment income, would have received the maximum credit for their number of qualifying children, but because of the rule that for any claimant—whether single of married, with or without children—that investment income cannot be greater than $3,100, will instead receive zero EIC.
_	In other words, formula_6 is defined by the rule that says formula_7 if and only if there is an element formula_8 such that formula_9 (i.e. formula_10 and formula_11).
_	The play highlighted the rule that the center's snap to the quarterback is considered a backward pass and not a handoff, therefore the dropped ball was not a fumble and could be advanced.
_	When pronounced as scientific Latin name, the pronunciation would be ""fook-see-a"", if one applies the rule that the root word in honorific Latin names should follow as much as possible the original pronunciation of the name of the person the plant is named for, plus the standard pronunciation of the Latin suffix.
_	In the brown alga "Fucus", all four egg cells survive oogenesis, which is an exception to the rule that generally only one product of female meiosis survives to maturity.
_	When it moved beyond the rule that merely grouped parents and children, and, in the 1982 amendments, grouped siblings together as well, Congress interfered substantially with the desires of demonstrably separate families to remain separate families.
_	In the context of housing discrimination, this statute creates the rule that public housing authorities cannot deny housing to a disabled person solely because of his or her disability, and that if a reasonable accommodation can be made to make housing available to a disabled person, the landlord is required to make the accommodation.
_	Strictly speaking, Denning was in breach of the rule that the Court of Appeal is bound by its own earlier decisions; but in "Albert v Motor Insurers Bureau" the House of Lords in 1971 approved the "Connell" judgment in preference to that in "Coward".
_	Approval Voting can also be compared to plurality voting, without the rule that discards ballots that vote for more than one candidate.
_	Some groups employ the rule that a 'fist-sized' area should be dampened on an opponent's clothing to be counted as a hit while others are more liberal, allowing almost any level of water contact (apart from simply mist) as counting as a hit.
_	The 1990 act mandated that trials for both rape offences be at the Central Criminal Court, removed the rule that males under 14 were considered incapable of sexual offences, and relaxed the obligation to warn the jury about an alleged victim's uncorroborated testimony.
_	On August 22, 2011, the FCC voted to remove the rule that implemented the Fairness Doctrine, along with more than 80 other rules and regulations, from the "Federal Register" following an executive order by President Obama directing a "government-wide review of regulations already on the books" to eliminate unnecessary regulations.
_	It is the rule that:
_	This ship was a fortunate exception to the rule that Dutch ships were too slow to successfully pursue and capture the usually more nimble and speedy corsairs.
_	In 1788-9 he was Master of the Rolls in Ireland; in theory a senior judicial office, it was then largely a sinecure, but so blatant a choice of a man who wholly unqualified for it gave rise to unfavourable comment, and a few years later it became the rule that the Master must be a lawyer of repute.
_	Following weeks of dissension, and after Hulk Hogan enforced the rule that Bully Ray must challenge one of the members of the group for the next title defense on the September 12 special episode of "Impact Wrestling: No Surrender", on the September 5 episode of "Impact", Mr. Anderson intentionally missed handing the hammer to Bully Ray to get out of "Scorpion Deathlock" by Sting, thus losing the no-DQ match.
_	However Californians for an Open Primary challenged the measure as a violation of the rule that ballot propositions must deal with only a single subject.
_	Thus, "Barker" has since been cited by the Court as the source of the rule that the Land Claims Act itself extinguished aboriginal title.
_	The Tour organisation wanted to the press to focus on the winners, so they added the rule that after the 14th to 20th stage, the last-ranked cyclist in the general classification would be removed.
_	The idea that white signifies the bride's virginity has long since been abandoned, but the rule that others present should avoid white has not.
_	He goes on to explain that in Albert Einstein's special theory of relativity, the rule that nothing can go faster than the speed of light, does not apply to galaxies in an expanding universe.
_	Van Mierop refused to honour the bills and argued that Pillans had not provided consideration for their guarantee since there was the rule that past consideration is not a good consideration.
_	Schoenbaum argued that the affair revealed different aspects of the Second "Reich", and argued that the Zabern Affair was the exception that proved that the rule that the Second Reich was no more or less liberal or illiberal then other Western nations.
_	In spite of the rule that says "success in the intelligence world is a buried secret while failure is a world wide scandal" the GID did achieve many successes a few of which were released and dramatized in Egyptian TV and cinema.
_	A regulation in, 16 July 1982 specified that: "the clothing and appearances of personnel working at public institutions; the rule that female civil servants' head must be uncovered".
_	Slater defined "n"* by the rule that for n = 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6 respectively; "n"* = 1, 2, 3, 3.7, 4.0 and 4.2.
_	Following the Good Parliament of 1376, he was one of a cohort of Londoners who ousted Richard Lyons and others from city offices and introduced the rule that Common Council members be chosen according to craft guild affiliations rather than by city ward.
_	Further changes included the removal of all World War II references from Wonder Woman's origin, the changing of Hippolyta's hair color to blonde, Wonder Woman's new ability to glide on air currents, and the introduction of the rule that Paradise Island would be destroyed if a man ever set foot on it.
_	The verb "sum" "I am" (or its parts) is an exception to the rule that verbs tend to come at the end of the sentence in Caesar and Cicero.
_	Even though the system was deemed legal for over half a year, the FIA decided that it broke the rule that no moving part can influence the aerodynamics of the car.
_	This mistreatment also happens in the de la Garza family where the family tradition prevents the main character, Tita, from marrying Pedro due to the rule that the second daughter must not marry.
_	The game is generally regarded as "broken" under this set of rules because a player can have his country bought out from under him in the first turn, and end up sidelined from the action before he has even had a chance to act: this is offset by the rule that states that any player bought off the rondel receives $1,000,000 from the buying player and then has the immediate opportunity to buy any available bond.
_	Power Blackjack is a variant of the card gambling game Blackjack, modified by certain doubling and splitting rules, called "Power Double" and "Power Split," that are advantageous to the player, offset by the rule that, when the dealer makes a total of twenty two, any active player hands push rather than winning.
_	By the bull of 8 December 1322, John XXII, declaring it ridiculous to pretend that every scrap of food given to the friars and eaten by them belonged to the pope, refused to accept ownership over the goods of the Franciscans in the future and granted them exemption from the rule that absolutely forbade ownership of anything even in common, thus forcing them to accept ownership.
_	Among these is the rule that the husband inherits the property of his deceased wife, her claim in case of the husband's death being settled in the marriage contract (Ketubah).
_	We invoke the rule that allows us to remove an even number of nots from a statement prefix
_	Hull is the player typically linked most to the rule that banned this practice because of the potential danger to goalies, who did not wear masks in that era.
_	Gustafson had the best allround point-sum ("samalog"), but Falk-Larssen won by the rule that a skater winning three distances, and merely having finished the fourth, is automatically pronounced the champion.
_	He also abolished the rule that required colored people to serve in the army without choice.
_	She reveals that she too had a child with a fairy and the rule that a fairy raised in the human world will be forcibly taken from the human world once he/she turns nine years old.
_	In 1854, the rank of colonel general () was created in order to promote William, Prince of Prussia (the later William I, German Emperor) to senior rank without breaking the rule that only wartime field commanders could receive the rank of field marshal for a victory in a decisive battle or the capture of a fortification or major town.
_	Due to the rule that the games should not be related to any language, this was transformed to Pünct.
_	Rather than cosmological redshifts being a consequence of the relative velocities that are subject to the laws of special relativity (and thus subject to the rule that no two locally separated objects can have relative velocities with respect to each other faster than the speed of light), the photons instead increase in wavelength and redshift because of a global feature of the spacetime metric through which they are traveling.
_	His call-up to the senior team was made possible due to the rule that each club in the Calcutta Football League must have 2 under-19 players in the squad.
_	Though originally buried on the battlefield, Autie Reed and Boston Custer's remains were exhumed, the only exceptions to the rule that only commissioned officers would be shipped home for reburial.
_	There are identity types with the J-eliminator (which already appeared in MLTT73 but did not have this name there) but also with the rule that makes the theory "extensional" (p. 169).
_	He points to two procedural rules, which the Court found fault with: First, the rule "allowing the Secretary of Defense to change the governing rules 'from time to time; and second, the rule that "permits the admission of any evidence that would have 'probative value to a reasonable person.
_	Thus the rule that the new owner of hired property may not eject a lessee should be balanced by the rule that the lessee is required to abide by the terms of the lease.
_	Anabelle is the one who quotes "silence" when someone breaks the rule that states "No one may talk while on the platform" even when asked a question that is rephrased to the other villagers.
_	On September 25, 2007, Chief Justice Reynato Puno officially announced the approval or promulgation of the Writ of Amparo: "Today, the Supreme Court promulgated the rule that will place the constitutional right to life, liberty and security above violation and threats of violation.
_	The shot clock and its enforcement is used in concert with the rule that requires an offensive team to advance the ball across half-court and into the offensive zone (or front court) within a referee's count (this rule was first introduced in 1933, predating the shot clock by over 2 decades).
_	Production (agricultural, industrial, renting, etc.), is subject to a 10% or 5% zakat (also known as Ushur (عُشر), or "one-tenth"), using the rule that if both labor and capital are involved, 5% rate is applied, if only one of the two are used for production, then the rate is 10%.
_	And that "the rule that political speech cannot be limited based on a speaker’s wealth is a necessary consequence of the premise that the First Amendment generally prohibits the suppression of political speech based on the speaker’s identity."
_	Brazil qualified automatically due to the rule that the winner of the last FIFA World Cup would qualify automatically.
_	Exceptions to the rule that a point of order must be raised at the time of violation include that a point of order may be raised at any time a motion was adopted in violation of the bylaws or applicable law, in conflict with a previously adopted motion (unless adopted by the vote to rescind it), or in violation of a fundamental principle of parliamentary law.
_	Temple due to the rule that women were not allowed inside until the pagodas were finished.
_	Similarly, in the present case, the court applied the rule that "where there is strong evidence of [a defendant's] guilt, especially where there is strong forensic evidence, the proffered evidence about a third party's alleged guilt" may (or perhaps must) be excluded.
_	In 1848, Exbrayat established the rule that no holds below the waist were to be allowed; neither were painful holds or torsions that would hurt the opponent.
_	Roman military discipline could be extremely severe, and the emperor Aurelian (r. 270–275 CE), who had a reputation for extreme strictness, instituted the rule that soldiers who seduced the wives of their hosts should have their legs fastened to two bent-down trees, which were then released, ripping the man in two.
_	Election as an honorary member probably related to the rule that once existed that full members should be resident in London.
_	Arguing that dreams in which one relives trauma serve a binding function in the mind, connected to repetition compulsion, Freud admits that such dreams are an exception to the rule that the dream is the fulfillment of a wish.
_	"Farbzwang" (or "Bedienzwang") literally means "suit compulsion" and is the rule that players must follow the suit of the first card to be led to the trick, provided that they have a card of that suit.
_	In 1870, the South Carolina Constitution of 1868 lifted the rule that had until then prevented a governor's re-election until four years had passed since leaving office.
_	However, she considered the "only flaw" to be "the rule that time cannot be changed if one knows what is going to happen ... though it is probably best not to question the timey wimey side of things and just accept it and enjoy the adventure".
_	He never played an NHL game, as the Sabres were not able to get around the rule that a player was required to be sighted in both eyes.
_	The "translinear principle" is the rule that, in a translinear loop, the product of the currents through the CW TEs is equal to the product of the currents through the CCW TEs.
_	The committee ruled that Steinman remained eligible for the award despite his death, under the rule that allows awardees to receive the award who die between being named and the awards ceremony.
_	Section 1 of the Act overrides the old common law rule that a third party could not enforce the terms of a contract, as established in "Dunlop Pneumatic Tyre Co Ltd v Selfridge & Co Ltd", and also the rule that a third party could not act against the promisor, established in "Tweddle v Atkinson".
_	Remembering the rule that he can possess the first person who learns his true nature and that he has a new body, Chucky tells
_	He also established the rule that all citizens of Ambohimanga or Antananarivo should pass to offer "hasina" to the sovereign and wish him or her a long life if a fire ever broke out in their city, and that citizens should likewise congratulate the owners of houses that were spared from destruction if a fire had occurred nearby.
_	But still so inflexible is the rule that no inquiry on that subject is permitted.
_	After a wave of political criticism the rule that established the program was officially stayed before being passed into law over two years later.
_	Any rule in the game, including the rules specifying the criteria for winning and even the rule that rules must be obeyed, can be changed.
_	There are variations to the rule that applies, which may be one of the following:
_	When the card is turned over the player who turned over the card has play the rule that it is associated with it in "Ring of Fire".
_	Most importantly, many students were drilled on the rule that "certain words don't count", usually articles (namely, "a", "an", "the"), but sometimes also others, such as conjunctions (for example, "and", "or", "but") and some prepositions (usually "to", "of").
_	In the Orthodox Church, from about the sixth century, it has been the rule that bishops are single men or widowers.
_	This output therefore has [] immediately followed by a voiced consonant, even though the rule that produces [] only applies before voiceless consonants.
_	The interaction is thus "opaque": [] is present on the surface in an environment that differs from the environment in which the rule that creates it applies.
_	The coach protested, especially after the association officials approved the rule that Czech skiers have to prefer their home competitions to the foreign ones, and refused to follow it, stating that Strachová needs better rivals to remain a premier international skier.
_	The ORL enforces the rule that Wisconsin lawyers must complete 30 credits of Continuing Legal Education every two years.
_	Clotilde sets out the rule that the nuns shall follow, based on that of Luxeuil, and how Mummola's successors shall be elected.
_	When Rav Dimi came from the Land of Israel to Babylonia, he taught that the rule that one may violate any commandment except idolatry, prohibited sexual relations, and murder to stay alive applied only when there is no royal decree forbidding the practice of Judaism.
_	Being the queen, Bukang Liwayway abonished the rule that an encantada/encantado cannot fall in love with a human.
_	This observation is routinely attributed to former Harvard professor Henry Kissinger who in a 1997 speech at the Ashbrook Center for Public Affairs at Ashland University, said: "I formulated the rule that the intensity of academic politics and the bitterness of it is in inverse proportion to the importance of the subject they're discussing.
_	For the election of the country's first civilian president since the military coup of 1964, the military maintained the rule that prevailed during the dictatorial regime, according to which an Electoral College made up of the entire National Congress and representatives from State Assemblies was to elect the president.
_	'B' beat Dunshaughlin in the '56 final however due to the rule that no club may field two teams in the one grade, they were denied promotion.
_	By definition, an orientation of a "k"-simplex is given by an ordering of the vertices, written as ("v"...,"v"), with the rule that two orderings define the same orientation if and only if they differ by an even permutation.
_	The dish called "kaeng chuet" is an exception to the rule that a "kaeng" should contain chillies, garlic, onions and shrimp paste.
_	It was this iteration of the rule that stated a team had to place the players who met the bonus rule criteria on the Major League roster immediately.
_	During Yamamoto's first term as the prime minister, he abolished the rule that both the Navy Minister and Army Minister had to be active duty officers, and he had a reputation for being a liberal and a supporter of public claims for democracy and constitutional government.
_	The KNMG states that "there is no convincing evidence that circumcision is useful or circumcision of male minors is necessary for prevention or health", that "circumcision of male minors entails the risk of medical or psychological complications", that "circumcision of male minors is contrary to the rule that minors may only be exposed to medical treatments if illness or abnormalities are present", that "circumcision of male minors conflicts with the child’s right to autonomy and physical integrity", that circumcision of male minors should be restricted "as much as possible," and that "it is reasonable to put off circumcision until the age at which ... the boy himself can decide about the intervention, or
_	The Treaty of Sèvres, signed on August 10, 1920 between the Allies and Turkey, laid the foundations for the new Turkish frontier after World War I. Assyrians were not permitted by Great Britain to participate in these deliberations under the rule that the Assyrians were not an equal power with the rest of the participants.
_	Regarding the rule that coaches must remain seated during a game, Hayes was quoted as saying:
_	Note that, since "Anniversary", attacking in a sea zone where there are allied destroyers present does not negate the abilities of defending submarines, due to the rule that units attack separately and defend together.
_	The Mint had intended to render it with the abbreviation , and some after the coins' release argued it should have done, but Gladstone had intervened to invoke the rule that the last letter of a Latin abbreviation should be doubled to indicate the plural.
_	The "en passant" capture rule was added in the 15th century when the rule that gave pawns an initial double-step move was introduced.
_	This is one of the few exceptions to the rule that malice is not relevant in tort law.
_	He fought to maintain the Republican Party rule that requires an indicted leader to step down — the rule that ultimately resulted in Tom DeLay's resignation.
_	They all follow the rule that when the numeral is nominative or accusative, the noun becomes genitive plural, and the resulting noun phrase is neuter singular.
_	The item having come to imperial notice from the provincial disbursement sheets was disallowed as unfair and ordered to be refunded under the rule that such charges were to be met out of their incomes by the local governors and military deputy governors.
_	Maxwell Montes, Alpha Regio, and Beta Regio are the three exceptions to the rule that the surface features of Venus are to be named for females: women or goddesses.
_	These include the rule that the Dutch monarch cannot dissolve the House of Representatives more than once because of a conflict over a single political issue and that the Senate shall never block legislation for mere party politics, so that coalition governments (all Dutch governments since the 19th century) do not need a majority in the Senate.
_	His first goal came on 28 February 2015, against his parent club Club Atlético Independiente, who decided not to enforce the rule that players they loaned out couldn't play against them.
_	She was the first person with such a disability to attempt archery, so to avoid breaking the rule that the bow must not be attached to the archer, Grinham and her father Symon created a novel way of helping her grip her bow.
_	Along with Joseph Pitton de Tournefort, Rivinus was the first to apply consistently the rule that the names of all species in a genus should start with the same word (generic name).
_	NCSB enforces the rule that North Carolina lawyers must complete 12 credits of Continuing Legal Education each year.
_	After interviewing with both the Pittsburgh Pirates and New York Mets for their vacant managerial positions, Hurdle was hired by the Pirates on November 14, 2010, six weeks after John Russell had been fired, though much of the delay was attributed to the rule that the Pirates could not interview him until after the Rangers' World Series run.
_	Chief Justice Reynato Puno officially announced the Supreme Court of the Philippines' approval or promulgation of the Writ of Amparo: ""Today, the Supreme Court promulgated the rule that will place the constitutional right to life, liberty and security above violation and threats of violation.
_	His later four wives, namely Pritam, Saraswati, Dinesh Nandini and Asha, were chosen by Dalmia himself and maintained by him in separate houses, away from his ancestral home; he strictly laid down the rule that there be no social contact between his various wives and children.
_	Wycombe Wanderers thought they had signed Revell on 12 January 2010 on a free transfer but that deal fell through, on the rule that prevents players representing three clubs in one season.
_	Brandeis identified two prominent limitations on the federal judicial power based on the separation principle: the "case or controversy" requirement and the rule that federal courts have no power to render advisory opinions.
_	The name reflects the rule that in the match each team bowls a set maximum number of overs, usually between 20 and 50, although shorter and longer forms of limited overs cricket have been played.
_	piece of his is extant, perhaps because of the rule that the plays acted by the Children should not have been previously printed.
_	Despite their rarity, secret trusts still remain a staple of many law courses at university level, as they represent a rare exception to the rule that any disposition on death must be by way of a will (or a document incorporated by reference into a will) which complies with the applicable statutory requirements in the relevant jurisdiction.
_	To help control the situation, he established the rule that no one would be allowed to enter the Yukon without a ton of goods to support themselves, thus preventing the entry of desperate and potentially unruly speculators and adventurers.
_	Finally, it is necessary to know the rule that establishes in the gregorian calendar which years are leap years: if "yy" is not 0, the year is a leap year if "yy" is divisible by 4; if "yy" is 0 (centurial years), the year is leap year if "cc" is divisible by 4.
_	Polyphonic five-part-writing was the rule that Albert obeyed as well.
_	Haughmond was certainly a community of Canons Regular but only a little is known about the precise interpretation of the rule that prevailed or how well it was followed.
_	The input from external actors, in particular public institutions, can be pivotal as a means of cluster generation and development but cannot overturn the rule that innovation is a bottom up process.
_	Furthermore, the rule that the determination of rent could not be left to one of the parties had to be confined to the situation where the determination depended entirely upon the unfettered will of that party.
_	In April 1989, through the leadership of Secretary General Borislav Stanković, FIBA approved the rule that allowed NBA players to compete in international tournaments, including the Olympics.
_	The Bar enforces the rule that Wyoming lawyers must complete 15 credits of Continuing Legal Education each year.
_	Her father was generally supportive of her education and she was able to avoid the rule that prevented women from entering the university by attending lectures held by the university in Brunswick Street.
_	Through these writs, attempts were made to enforce the rule that the only correct way to receive a privilege or grant of land was through a written charter, which might have deprived most of the magnates of England of their lands and rights.
_	Soldiers from Palmyra even used their dialect of Aramaic for inscriptions, in a striking exception to the rule that Latin was the language of the military.
_	In "Stubart Investments Limited v The Queen", the Supreme Court of Canada decided to reject a strict approach and instead use the rule that "the words of an Act are to be read in their entire context and in their grammatical and ordinary sense harmoniously with the scheme of the Act, the object of the Act, and the intention of Parliament".
_	Accordingly the rule that an accused person is entitled to a verdict once he has pleaded has no application as the provision of s106(4) of the CPA relates only to the situation where an accused person pleads to a charge in a court which is trying him on that charge.
_	Mooniaruck was a member of the youth team at Norwich City, before signing for Manchester United on 3 March 1999 at the age of 13; United attempted to get around the rule that youth team players had to live within 90 minutes of the club by flying him to Manchester from Stansted Airport, and although the Football Association later clarified that it had to be a 90-minute drive, Mooniaruck remained at United.
_	For example, a silent usually indicates the soft pronunciation, as in "change"; this may be maintained before a suffix to indicate this pronunciation (as in "changeable"), despite the rule that usually drops this letter.
_	The law repealed the archaic "conformity principle" which had governed actions at law (and only actions at law) in U.S. federal courts for over 140 years; namely, the rule that federal courts should conform their procedure in such actions to that of the courts in the state in which they were located.
_	Iodoalkynes represent an exception to the rule that alkenes cannot be obtained from alkynes.
_	It is sometimes argued that where the constitutional documents of a company provide that the company has a lien over its own shares, this provision takes effect as an equitable lien, and if that analysis is correct, then it is probably the one exception to the rule that equitable liens arise by operation of law rather than by agreement.
_	It is also one of the rare exceptions to the rule that a transfer of assets which only takes effect upon a person's bankruptcy is normally void.
_	The text in two locations follows the rule that two consecutive identical letters are represented by a single rune, even when the two identical letters are at the end of one word and the start of a second word.
_	The first two of these rules were put in force as a compensation for the rule that the points obtained during the regular season are halved prior to the start of the championship playoff, to the complaint of several teams that had been in the lead after the regular season the past few seasons.
_	City planners also announced that the rule that buildings be constructed to reflect traditional Bhutanese architecture, which was often violated in the past, would be enforced more strictly.
_	In addition, the onus of proof at the trial is usually borne by the plaintiff, in terms of the rule that "he who makes the averment or asserts the claim must prove it," whereas during the provisional-sentence procedure the onus is on the defendant to satisfy the court that he will succeed in the principal case.
_	The minus sign comes from the fact the affinity was defined to represent the rule that spontaneous changes will ensue only when the change in the Gibbs free energy of the process is negative, meaning that the chemical species have a positive affinity for each other.
_	"There is no writer in this field who is more steadfast in practicing the rule that fiction is first of all entertainment", Algis Budrys said in 1965.
_	However, they are still subject to the rule that such securities must be "earmarked" specifically in records to a specific trust account.
_	Dawes, who posted the team's high optionals floor exercise score of 9.850, would have qualified seventh to the event finals but because of the rule that only two gymnasts from each country can compete, she was to be left out.
_	Despite its mention of bishops, there is no clear evidence in the New Testament that supports the concepts of dioceses and monepiscopacy (i.e. the rule that all the churches in a geographic area should be ruled by a single bishop).
_	In 1359 Bishop Gynwell, passing by the priory, noticed 'certain insolences and unlawful wanderings' of the canons, and wrote to reinforce the rule that none should go beyond the precincts of the monastery without reasonable cause, nor without the permission of the prior; and ordered further that such permission should not be too frequently given.
_	He also reminded them of the rule that none should eat or drink outside the monastery, or talk with seculars without permission.
_	Eichelberger conspicuously wore his three stars on his shoulders among the front-line troops, ignoring the rule that officers remove their insignia at the front because they would attract enemy fire.
_	The biggest change since 1621 was the elimination of the rule that required the electors to sign their ballots resulting in the detailed voting procedure of scrutiny making use of anonymous oaths.
_	Texas is an unusual exception to the rule that denial of "certiorari" by the state supreme court normally does not imply approval or disapproval of the merits of the lower court's decision.
_	It is the rule that:
_	according to the rule that, if , then for every position , .
_	It was replaced by the rule that for world records the shortest orthodromic track must be at least as long as the circumference of the earth (hence 21,600 nautical miles).
_	Watson notes, however, that his poem "Seeing a Friend Off" was "unusual in that it violates the rule that the two middle couplets ... must observe verbal parallelism", adding that Chinese critics excused this kind of violation in the case of a genius like Li.
_	The All American Football League was to be a professional American football league premised on the rule that all of its players had to have a four-year university degree, as employees of the AAFL rather than of the franchises, with the league to pay each player an average compensation of approximately $100,000 to year-round player employees and $50,000 to season-only players to attract the best non-NFL players.
_	The A-11 complies with the rule that caps the number of eligible receivers during any given play at five (maximum six if the quarterback hands the ball off or laterals to an ineligible receiver who then passes the ball).
_	The formation of these organizations coincided with the rule that all incoming university students - those who passed "examen artium" - had to demonstrate mastery of both for admission to university programs.
_	To be compliant, fantasy sports must follow the rule that: "prizes and awards offered to winning participants are established and made known to the participants in advance of the game or contest and their value is not determined by the number of participants or the amount of any fees paid by those participants."
_	When asked to cite the rule for application omissions, Royer admitted there wasn't one, but he insisted that Senecal violated the rule that says boat classification changes can only be made prior to the start of fishing.
_	These two roads are the most conspicuous exceptions to the rule that even numbers signify west-to-east E-roads.
_	Byamee also established the rule that there should be a common camping-ground for the various tribes, where, during the fishing festival, peace should be strictly kept, all meeting to enjoy the fish, and do their share towards preserving the fisheries.
_	The decision in the 1964 case of People of California v. Hernandez by the California Supreme Court brought into question the validity of the rule that mistake as to the age of a female is no defense to a statutory rape charge.
_	The business of a "finitor" could only be done by a free man, and the honorable nature of his office is indicated by the rule that there was no bargain for his services, but he received his pay in the form of a gift.
_	Justice Brennan joined Justice Marshall in his dissent, but wrote a separate statement (joined by Justice Marshall), in which he indicated that the "interests" mentioned by Justice Marshall, which would justify allowing Federal and State prosecutions for the same illegal act, are not of a nature that would justify any other exception to the rule that one may not be prosecuted more than once for the same offense.
_	Roping in new executives who had worked in the auto industry in western countries, such as Pawan Goenka and Alan Durante, the company broke the rule that says automakers must design, engineer and test their own vehicles while spending millions of dollars in the process.
_	He was retained as chief counsel by the Warren Bridge group in the US Supreme Court case "Charles River Bridge v. Warren Bridge" 36 U.S. 420 (1837), where the case laid down the rule that public contracts must be construed in favor of states.
_	Among those innovations was the rule that each singer had to present his or her song live (to music from half-playback).
_	It also documents the harsh effects of Proposition 48, the rule that requires at least a 700 on the SAT for NCAA eligibility.
_	In 1962 he initiated the rule that all cardinals should be bishops.
_	A recent infraction of the rule that no Venetian citizen should serve a foreign power without the express leave of the Serenissima rankled at Venice: Cardinal Vincenzo Grimani had moved to Vienna in 1699 and was appointed viceroy of Naples in 1708.
_	Björn Skifs was unhappy with the rule that every country would have to perform in their native language.
_	"Lullaby of Birdland" is a 1952 popular song with music by George Shearing and lyrics by George David Weiss under the pseudonym "B. Y. Forster" in order to circumvent the rule that ASCAP and BMI composers could not collaborate.
_	Groveway Stadium joined the NGRC banner and the NGRC also relaxed the rule that previously did not allow any NGRC owner or trainer to attend an independent track.
_	Dryden was himself the first to promulgate the rule that a sentence must not end with a preposition.
_	Alice is placed in the second rank as one of the White Queen's pawns, and begins her journey across the chessboard by boarding a train that literally jumps over the third row and directly into the fourth rank, thus acting on the rule that pawns can advance two spaces on their first move.
_	The Tour de France organisers did not like the attention that last-placed finishers got, so for the 1980 Tour de France they added the rule that after some stages the last-placed cyclist in the general classification would be removedfrom the race.
_	Hotelito Desconocido violated the rule that specified that there could not be construction in the 69.3 km (43 mi) stretch of the beach where it was built.
_	All submissions and declines are ultimately at Clews' discretion except for the rule that all reviews must be four words or fewer.
_	Lastly, the rule that /g/ must occur with front vowels and with back vowels can be broken when either or in suffix-initial position becomes assimilated by the other due to the preceding consonant being such.
_	This is achieved by the rule that we can cut at most one child of each non-root node.
_	Mulcaster also formulated the rule that a double letter, when final, indicated a short vowel in English, while the absence of doubling and the presence of silent made the vowel long.
_	The royal power, however, gradually asserted itself, and it became the rule that permission to levy local taxes should be obtained from the king.
_	The Shinwari tribe were the first to openly rebel against king Amanullah Khan's imposition of various new laws, including the requirement to wear European dress, the rule that required them to send a quota of their daughters to Kabul for education and the impositions of taxes (they had never previously paid tax).
_	Exceptions to the rule that firestopping is insulators' work include firestop devices which become part of a plumbing system and which must be installed by plumbers during the forming of concrete.
_	Moreover, the rule that four or more pieces in a row are illegal to form also applies in the Drop phase.
_	In his principal work, "De la saisie des bâtiments neutres" (1759), he was the first to formulate the rule that cargo on neutral ships is not a legitimate prize in warfare.
_	He established the rule that a Camorrista had to have a regular job as a cover.
_	It also instituted controls over the marriages of persons without fixed addresses ("vagrants are to be married with caution"), "regulated the times at which marriages could be celebrated, abolished the rule that sexual intercourse created affinity, and reiterated the ban on concubinage".
_	In Syria, Palmyrene soldiers even used their dialect of Aramaic for inscriptions, in a striking exception to the rule that Latin was the language of the military.
_	The two quickly married on Mars at Nix Olympia, and they both retired from the Legion because of the rule that Legionnaires could not be married.
_	Second, a more serious obstacle, which the Athenian orators never completely overcame, was the rule that no one could take a fee to plead the cause of another.
_	With reference to hotness, the comparative terms hotter and colder are defined by the rule that heat flows from the hotter body to the colder.
_	Reflex principles are presumptions to be applied in cases of doubt, such as the rule that where the moral right to something is unclear one favours the person in possession (cf. "chezkat mamon").
_	Deep water is an exception to the rule that wider tires improve road holding.
_	Kinship-based societies, for example, operate under the rule that collective group resources are not to serve individual purposes.
_	In 2004, Jack Lynch, assistant professor of English at Rutgers University, wrote that the correction of the subject-positioned "me and you" to "you and I" leads people to "internalize the rule that 'you and I' is somehow more proper, and they end up using it in places where they should not – such as 'he gave it to you and I' when it should be 'he gave it to you and me.'"
_	There are a number of notable exceptions to the rule that "Elohim" is treated as singular when referring to the God of Israel, including Gen. 20:13, 35:7, 2 Sam. 7:23 and Ps. 58:11, and notably the epithet of the "Living God" (Deuteronomy 5:26 etc.), which is constructed with the plural adjective, "Elohim Hayiym" but still takes singular verbs.
_	The runes in the prayer follow the rule that double letters are represented with only a single rune, even if one of the two letters are at the end of one word and the second is at the beginning of the next word.
_	The core aim of this second approach to identification is therefore to identify and reveal the rule that represents the system.
_	Klosterneuburg arms are divided according to the rule that only the abbot (Dean) can use all the arms, while the bishops who belonged to the monastery uses half combined with another emblem.
_	Upon death, his son Prince Joshua Nnama chose to pass over the throne to pursue his Christian work as a missionary in SE Nigeria, at which point his own son GCD Nnama was given the throne, unfortunately proper ceremonial rights were not done for many years, and Nibo was officially without a ruler till the town decided to vote and pass the rule that in order to make it fair, they should rotate it among villages.
_	In fact, ZCN is the rule that attempts to verify the zero valued variable nodes and D1CN is responsible for non-zero valued variable nodes.
_	This technique relies upon the rule that any money invested in a stock paying dividends will earn a greater return than shares that are not paying dividends.
_	Although he still had a running contract with FC Torpedo, he was given a free transfer, due to the rule that does not allow any foreign players in Russian Second Division.
_	If cross-effects that result in diffusive transfer of internal energy were also labeled as heat transfers, they would sometimes violate the rule that pure heat transfer occurs only down a temperature gradient, never up one.
_	Before the entry into force of that Code, it was an almost universal custom to confer all four minor orders at one time, since the bishop was authorized to dispense from the rule that each order had to be exercised for some time before reception of the next highest order.
_	Part III in sections 7 to 68 concerns the certification of pension schemes, and the rule that people with entitlement to such schemes get reduced state benefits, and other effects.
_	Although there were arguments to be made in favor of treating "serious bodily injury" as a sentencing factor, the rule that statutes should be construed to avoid constitutional difficulties counseled in favor of treating it as an element of the crime.
_	According to one account, in the Highlands of Scotland the rule that all common fires must be previously extinguished applied only to the houses situated between the two nearest running streams (Kelly, "Curiosities of Indo-European Tradition and Folklore", p. 53 seq.).
_	As in all tarocchi games, there is the rule that a player that can't follow suit must trump if possible.
_	Many Jewish leaders and journalists have criticised "Seven Jewish Children" as antisemitic, contending that it violates the rule that "a play that is critical of, and entirely populated by, characters from one community, can be defended only if it is written by a member of that community".
_	Democratic rights include the rule that Parliament and the legislatures of Ontario and Quebec must sit at least once a year under sections 20 and 86, and there must be a federal election at least once every five years under section 50.
_	Also, rather than following the rule that the masculine includes the feminine, it is relatively common to create doublets, especially in polemical speech: "Québécoises et Québécois," "tous et toutes," "citoyens et citoyennes".
_	Rothken and his team cited the rule that required the US to serve a foreign corporation at an office in the United States.
_	Rejecting proposed analyses of the cruise as an entire obligation, and alternatively as a payment conditional on performance, the High Court re-affirmed the rule that failure of consideration must be total in order for a claim for restitution to be sustained.
_	However, the rule that specifies a recipe for the target need not have any prerequisites.
_	The Soviet of the Union (, "Sovet Soyuza") was the lower chamber of the Supreme Soviet of the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics, elected on the basis of universal, equal and direct suffrage by secret ballot in accordance with the principles of Soviet democracy, and with the rule that there be one deputy for every 300,000 people.
_	At the World Motor Sport Council meeting held in Paris on 8 September, the tribunal elected to uphold the $100,000 fine imposed on Ferrari, decided that no further action would be taken against the team, and that Formula One's Sporting Working Group would review the rule that prohibited team orders.
_	On appeal, the Supreme Court of Mississippi issued an opinion that serve as precedent in Mississippi for the rule that a stockholder of a corporation is not liable for the debts, liabilities, and other acts of the corporation.
_	Some may represent "bona fide" exceptions to the rule that mitochondrial sequence clusters coincide with species defined by other means.
_	Gregory instituted the rule that to win election by scrutiny, a candidate must secure two-thirds of the votes of the electors in the conclave in a secret ballot.
_	His only surviving son, Narasaraja Wadiyar, died (believed to be an effect of the curse in folklore) just a day before the commencement of Navaratri, but the king after consulting experts laid down the rule that the celebration of the ceremonies was not to be interrupted even by the death of members of the royal family.
_	Montague broke the rule that losers on the programme cannot take part again unless invited back.
_	The Nordic Passport Union extend the rule that identity documents are not needed by domestic citizens, to cover all Nordic citizens.
_	As a result of a dispute over the land that arose in the mid-18th century, the Magistrate and Prefect of the Dongguan County Court ruled that the Customary Land Law took precedence over the Imperial Law, thus preserving the subsoil:topsoil rights status quo (including the rule that, though the tax-paid land area of the subsoil holder was only the temple itself and its immediately vicinity, the rights of the topsoil holders extended automatically to all adjoining waste and mountainous land, i.e. the entire island).
_	SBAND enforces the rule that North Dakota lawyers must complete 45 credits of Continuing Legal Education every 3 years.
_	Maxwell Montes, Alpha Regio, and Beta Regio are the three exceptions to the rule that the surface features of Venus are to be named for females: women or goddesses.
_	In this sense, it is usually used when an exception to a rule has been identified: for example, Mutillidae are wasps without wings which cannot fly, and therefore are an exception that proves (tests) the rule that wasps fly.
_	The Bar enforces the rule that Missouri lawyers must complete 15 credits each year.
_	"Price v. Watkins " would be cited for the next two centuries in various state and Federal courts for the rule that when a testator bequeaths a life estate in his surviving spouse, with the premises (or the proceeds of the sale thereof) going to the testator's children after the death of the surviving spouse, the legacy to the child or children vests at the time of the testator's death.
_	His influence in Europe was due to the conversions he effected and to the rule that he composed.
_	In reaching this decision the Court stated that the rule that state and federal courts should reach outcomes substantially the same was not a "talisman" and that there were more basic principles governing "Erie Railroad Co. v. Tompkins" and its progeny (that is, cases dealing with how Federal courts should apply state law).
_	One might further have supposed that the rule that Levites were disqualified by age obtained even at Shiloh and at the Temple at Jerusalem, where the Levites sang in the choir and guarded the doors of the Temple.
_	In cases of economic loss, the rule that a claimant cannot normally recover for a lost chance is modified.
_	The latter two selections are the only exceptions to the rule that a player may receive the award only once.
_	In the autumn of 1940 he transferred his ship "Octavian" to a company registered in Panama and run by himself, thus breaking the rule that all Norwegian ships be controlled by Nortraship, albeit he claimed to have obtained a dispensation from Norwegian authorities.
_	Similarly, a clear statement rule governs exceptions to the rule that legislation must be considered as addressed to the future, not to the past."
_	But the Bible here implies the rule that whoso deals kindly with any one of the spiritual heads of Israel, to him it is accounted as if he had done so to the whole people" (compare Lev. R. xxxiv. 8).
_	The German spelling reform of 1996 abolished the rule that compound words with triple consonants coalesce them into double consonants.
_	The 21 September 2006 quiz, was found to be in breach of the rule that "competitions should be conducted fairly".
_	Fisichella led the race at the time, having just overtaken Räikkönen; however, it was the Finn who was declared the race winner under the rule that stipulated that the race result in such circumstances was to be taken from the running order two laps prior to the race being stopped.
_	While the Catholic Church generally adheres to the rule that all wine for sacramental use must be pure grape wine and alcoholic, it is accepted that there are some circumstances, where the priest is an alcoholic for example, where it may be necessary to use a wine that is only minimally fermented, called "mustum".
_	After Anquetil and Géminiani had shown that the rule that bicycle changes were not allowed was easily circumvented by faking a mechanical problem, this rule was removed for the next year.
_	The original premise didn't fit well with the central concept of the New Universe: as a visitor from another dimension, Justice contradicted the rule that there had been no superhumans before the White Event, and the fact that this other dimension was peopled by a race biologically identical to humans, who all spoke English, and who lived in a society closely resembling a romanticized Medieval Europe, overrode the New Universe's advertised basis in realism.
_	For example, as an accidental byproduct of the rule that doubles consonants in this situation after a short vowel, a double will normally indicate the hard pronunciation (e.g. "bagged" is pronounced , not as ).
_	As said, after this race the rule that mandated mechanics was never again applied.
_	The only official possible exception to the rule that Hotchkiss tanks had to be modified first was made on 12 February 1940 when it was ordered to replace the turrets of 24 Infantry tanks, without specifying the type, present in depot or driver schools in order to obtain older turrets to be fitted on R 35 export vehicles.
_	Press began to blur the characters in the show with the actors and it was at this point that Julia Smith — in an attempt to dispel confusion about reality and fiction — introduced the rule that no actor was ever to appear in public "in character".
_	On the other hand, the opposite party claimed that Ottaviano had still nine votes, and that the Sicilian party, having majority, simply broke the rule that required unanimity for the valid election.
_	However, this did not allow him to play in the final game of the season because the rule that prevents players representing three clubs in one season would only allow him to play while his emergency loan was valid.
_	Thus, sets forth the rule that if any such change took place, both the "original sacrifice and the exchange thereof should be holy."
_	On this point, the Federal Court of Appeal noted that accidental genetic contamination of a crop beyond a farmer's control should be an exception to the rule that intent is not an issue in patent disputes.
_	Böhme rigorously enforced the rule that for every German killed, 100 Serbs or Jews would be shot.
_	In 1885, Giffard was appointed Lord Chancellor in Lord Salisbury's first administration, and was created Baron Halsbury, of Halsbury in the County of Devon, thus forming a remarkable exception to the rule that no criminal lawyer could ever reach the woolsack.
_	The Bar enforces the rule that Nebraska lawyers must complete 10 credits each year.
_	This led them to falsely assume that the sawfish, like many other marine vertebrates with a "beak," or an elongated rostrum, follow the rule that the appendage is used to either sense prey or capture prey, but never both.
_	While this is intuitively false and is also false according to Carnap's theory of induction, observing non-ravens (according to that same theory) causes us to reduce our estimate of the total number of ravens, and thereby reduces the estimated number of possible counterexamples to the rule that all ravens are black.
_	The Quality Assurance Agency consulted in 2014 on the inclusion of "Juris Doctor" in the UK Framework for Higher Education Qualifications as an exception to the rule that "doctor" should only be used by doctoral degrees.
_	In both languages, identifiers consist of letters and digits, with the rule that the first character may not be a digit.
_	In 38 BC Agrippa refused a triumph for his victories under Octavian's command, and this precedent established the rule that the "princeps" should assume both the salutation and title of "imperator".
_	The great exceptions to the rule that synagogues are built in the prevailing style of their time and place are the wooden synagogues of the former Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth.
_	In the nineteenth century, Rabbi Shlomo Ganzfried published a manual for scribes called "Keset HaSofer", in which he follows the rule that all "parashot" in Esther are closed {S} ("Keset HaSofer" 28:5).
_	She operated under the rule that no patient was ever turned away.
_	However, Harold Mattingly argues that the work could in fact postdate this, as Brasidas' expedition was a drastic exception to the rule that land powers did not mount distant expeditions.
_	The Carmen organise the ceremony of Cart Marking, which originated in the rule that no cart could ply for hire within the City of London unless licensed by the Corporation.
_	The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight.
_	Director Atom Egoyan, who wrote the screenplay, first conceived of the story in the fall of 1992, intrigued by the ritualistic nature of table dances and the rule that clients can't touch the dancers, envisioning a story of a dancer having a main customer.
_	Some games include the rule that any player who runs out of cards and snaps fastest is declared the winner, whereas other versions of the game simply go on until players choose to leave.
_	The Qur'an does not explicitly mention the shares of male relatives, such as the decedent's son, but provides the rule that the son's share must be twice that of the daughter's.
_	In fact there was an exception to the rule that proconsuls must be ex-consuls, which was exercised in the event that legitimate ex-consuls could not be found, as was the case more frequently in the search for officers qualified to be provincial governors.
_	Thompson successfully petitioned the LPGA to receive a waiver to the rule that LPGA Tour members must be at least 18 years old, allowing her to enter the 2011 LPGA Qualifying School for Tour membership in 2012.
_	One continuing controversy of the player selection process is the rule that each team has to have at least one representative on its league's All-Star roster.
_	Since the 2000s, the railways hold to the rule that a city's principal station may be called "Centraal" if it has more than a certain number of passengers per day (currently 40.000).
_	The runes aukinla-h on the stone, which translate as "and Ginnlaug," follow the rule that double consonants are represented with only a single consonant, even if one of the two consonants are at the end of one word and the second is at the beginning of the next word.
_	During his trip, Griffin abided by the rule that he would not change his name or alter his identity; if asked who he was or what he was doing, he would tell the truth.
_	The basis of resident killer whale groupings is the rule that each animal travels primarily with its mother throughout their lives.
_	The second primary area where courts have sought to constrain trustee discretion, but recently have retreated, is in the rule that trustees' decisions may be interfered with if irrelevant issues are taken into account, or relevant issues are ignored.
_	In my opinion, the fact that the club put aside the rule that no player should receive more than four pounds a week ...
_	Rules that apply to relative velocities in special relativity, such as the rule that relative velocities cannot increase past the speed of light, do not apply to relative velocities in comoving coordinates, which are often described in terms of the "expansion of space" between galaxies.
_	Other Protestant synods also lay down the rule that persons unable to take wine shall be admitted to the Lord's Table on condition that they shall at least touch with their lips the cup which holds the species of wine; Jurieu, on the other hand, starting from the principle that Christ has founded the essence of the Eucharist on the two species, held that an "abstemius" does not receive the Sacrament, because it consists of two parts, and he receives only one.
_	As Rae argued and Taylor proved in 1969, majority rule is the rule that maximizes the likelihood that the issues a voter votes for will pass and that the issues a voter votes against will fail.
_	However, in both cases, the Marshall Court continued to apply the rule that aboriginal title was inalienable, except to The Crown.
_	Regulations enacted recently by the European Union have applied the rule that 85% of the grapes in the wine must be of the variety on the label.
_	Later, a student from Jamia wrote in an open letter to the Vice Chancellor, stating that not only was the revision of the rule that was restrictive, rather, the pre-existing order of rules too called for parental permission or local guardian's consent to authorize a night out to women.
_	The cancrizans, and often the mensuration canon, take exception to the rule that the follower must start later than the leader; that is, in a typical canon, a follower cannot come before the leader (for then the labels 'leader' and 'follower' should be reversed) or at the same time as the leader (for then two lines together would constantly be in unison, or parallel thirds, etc., and there would be no counterpoint), whereas in a crab canon or mensuration canon the two lines can start at the same time and still respect good counterpoint.
_	If the child does not like what the parent has prepared, then he/she will most likely not consume it, going against the rule that “it must be consumed in its entirety.
_	In "Ward v Duncombe" [1893] AC 369, the House of Lords decided that the rule that notice determines priority of dealings applied regardless of the conduct of the competing assignees.
_	Subsequent lower court cases have interpreted the "Brushaber" decision ("the confusion is not inherent, but rather arises from the conclusion ... this erroneous assumption") and the Sixteenth Amendment as standing for the rule that the Amendment allows a direct tax on "wages, salaries, commissions, etc. without apportionment."
_	Lewis and Clark pass is an exception to the rule that highways follow old Indian pathways.
_	As in Königrufen, there is also the rule that when the Sküs, Mond (XXI) and Pagat (I) meet, the Pagat wins the trick (the so-called Fairy Tale Trick or "Märchenstich").
_	When computers must add two numbers, the rule that:
_	Among those, the required quorum of 90 members of the Folketing, and the rule that every proposed law requires three readings in the Folketing, before it can be passed into law.
_	Through this spell, Willow successfully granted every potential Slayer across the globe the full power of her eventual birthright, permanently altering the rule that "in every generation there is a Chosen One.
_	Naidu also challenged the social norms embodied in Madras cricket, such as the rule that forbade non-Europeans from enjoying the comforts of the pavilion during lunch and instead being left sitting under the shade of trees to eat lunch.
_	The lightning had struck a trackside LKD2-T1 signal assembly, burning out its fuses, and violating the rule that it should be 'fail-safe'.
_	Combined with the rule that they appoint only professors with a professional career of at least three years outside the university system, those are the two major ways in which they differ from traditional universities.
_	This error is caused by the checker, a mechanism that checks the condition of the rules, and the rule that occurred before it.
_	They couldn't be promoted to senior level however due to the rule that a club cannot enter two teams in the one grade.
_	He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.
_	It has since become the rule that replays are never held and the trophy is automatically shared.
_	The novel is passed along from author to author, each adding a new chapter or section to the work, with the rule that each subsequent chapter or section should elaborate and follow the plotline of preceding chapters or sections.
_	In cases addressing other encryption software, however, two federal appeals courts have established the rule that cryptographic software source code is speech protected by the First Amendment (the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals in the Bernstein case and the Sixth Circuit Court of Appeals in the Junger case).
_	Additionally, it is the rule that 100% of the service charge received is paid out to food and beverage employees and any breach of this will be thoroughly investigated.
_	In a review of the first six episodes, Dan Martin of "The Guardian" thought that they were strong and it was "generally funnier [and] appears to have rewritten the rule that said "Doctor Who" had to out-epic itself every year".
_	Many federal circuit courts and state supreme courts interpreting "Navarette" have affirmed the rule that officers need not personally corroborate incriminating details before making an arrest based on information provided by an anonymous tip.
_	Abaye taught that the rule that a community should mark graves may be derived from "And put not a stumbling-block before the blind."
_	Ware culture is one of the few exceptions to the rule that pottery and farming coexist in Europe.
_	1 Ch 796 is a UK company law case, also relevant for English contract law, concerning shares, and the rule that shares should be exchanged for consideration that is in some sense at least sufficient, not necessarily adequate.
_	In the first civil suit heard in New South Wales, Henry and Susannah Kable won damages of £15 against the captain (Duncan Sinclair) of the Alexander, this despite the rule that prisoners who had been sentenced to death were unable to sue in English law.
_	They are characterised by the rule that a player who cannot follow to a trick with a card of the suit led "must" play a trump to the trick if possible.
_	Böhme rigorously enforced the rule that for every German killed, 100 Serbs or Jews would be shot.
_	As a corollary to the rule that drivers generally must not pose an "immediate hazard" upon where or when they cannot assure such distance ahead is clear, it follows that others may presume that no vehicle is posing an "immediate hazard" from beyond where they can see with proper lookout.
_	Hallows authored the Court's opinion in the influential case Breunig v. American Family Insurance Company, which established the rule that a sudden mental incapacity, of which the defendant had no foreknowledge, was an adequate defense to tort liability.
_	Because of the rule that and become glides, the finals of ("qìr") and ("jìnr") are both , and ("qúnr") and ("lǘr") are both .
_	In 1974, because of construction on the future Interstate 670, and the rule that no state highway designation may duplicate a U.S. or Interstate highway designation within Ohio, the portion of SR 670 between SR 313 and SR 265 became SR 761, and the remainder became an extension of SR 313.
_	When Severus Snape caught Harry outside the school with this book in "Harry Potter and the Philosopher's Stone", he invented the rule that no library books were allowed outside the school, and confiscated it.
_	Seattle SuperSonics owner Sam Schulman signed Haywood to a six-year, $1.5 million contract, ignoring the rule that a player cannot join the league until he is four years out of high school.
_	This is applied to phenomena in time by the "schema" of causation, namely, the rule that the cause of a phenomenon is another phenomenon that invariably precedes it in time…."
_	In this way, Beck showed that a transcendental schema is the rule that leads to the understanding of successive [in time] sensations according to various pure concepts [Kant's "categories"].
_	The FCC eliminated the policy in 1987 and removed the rule that implemented the policy from the "Federal Register" in August 2011.
_	There is also the "JTE rule", the name given to the rule that stipulates that the competitor(s) may ask for a given question to be repeated up to three times per match.
_	A vice-president of the Ontario Jockey Club from 1895 to 1904, he unsuccessfully lobbied for the lifting of the rule that prevented horses foaled outside of the Province of Ontario from competing in the King's Plate.
_	Zaitsev was not the first chemist to publish the rule that now bears his name.
_	There are a few exceptions to the rule that a village must be indicated together with the vineyard name, those are a handful of historical vineyards known as "Ortsteil im sinne des Weingesetzes" (village name in sense of the wine law).
_	They do, however, contain examples and minor language changes designed to help guide entities within the SEC's enforcement authority in complying with the rule, which may lead some entities that had not previously complied with the rule to determine that they fall within the scope of the rule that the SEC and CFTC adopted.
_	Magnetic field lines would start or end on magnetic monopoles, so if they exist, they would give exceptions to the rule that magnetic field lines neither start nor end.
_	That was a violation of the rule that ambassadors had to be neutral.
_	Also, the English words "sphere" and "sphinx" , Greek loanwords, violate the rule that two fricatives may not appear adjacently word-initially.
_	The newly formed Jokers team entered into the British Columbia Lower Mainland Grass Hockey League in Division 1, circumventing the rule that new teams had to start in the second division by attending the league's AGM en masse and passing a motion for the exception (winning by a single vote).
_	There are exceptions to the rule that one sexual use or two non-sexual uses of "fuck" results in an R rating.
_	Parties sit in parliamentary groups, loosely following the rule that the political left sit to the Speaker's left and the political right to his right.
_	In response, Caterer was asked to resign but refused to do so, leading SACA to evoke, for the first time, the rule that allowed them to declare a position on the Ground and Finance Committee open.
_	The cardinals rejected the suggestion as inconsistent with the rule that papal elections must be free ones.
_	In modern legislation and jurisprudence it has become the rule that contravening a statute is not a crime unless the statute expressly says so in clear terms, and so the doctrine has long since lapsed.
_	Second, a more serious obstacle, which the Athenian orators never completely overcame, was the rule that no one could take a fee to plead the cause of another.
_	However Californians for an Open Primary challenged the measure as a violation of the rule that ballot propositions must deal with only a single subject.
_	In that same interview he states that he doesn't believe in the rule that says that each piece has to have a beginning and an ending.
_	According to the 1913 "Catholic Encyclopedia", "It was formerly the rule that a priest should always wear it in giving absolution in confession, and it is probable that the ancient usage which requires an English judge assume the 'black cap' in pronouncing sentence of death is of identical origin."
_	In the Royal Rumble Match, the rule that a wrestler can exit the ring on their own terms and still not be eliminated, as was seen numerous times in the 2003 event, is recognised in the game.
_	Starting out in a recording studio with the rule that nobody could bring in old demos or ideas, "Battle in Me" sprung from the group jamming.
_	For all other sales of property where the seller goes bankrupt or into sequestration, the rule that applies is that owner is the holder of the registered title.
_	Wendell Robie who founded the ride, set the rule that riders must be at least twelve years of age to enter and would be considered a junior rider until the age of eighteen.
_	As to the treatment of such [illegal] immigrants, when they are discovered, it should be the rule that they are at once returned to the country whence they came.
_	"In the case of causal relation, the schema is the rule that "the effect must follow the cause in time"."
_	However, the team cannot be promoted to the First League until 2018-19 season due to the rule that a team can play in the highest level only after 3 seasons of existence.
_	Define a relation "R" on strings by the rule that "x R y" if there is no distinguishing extension for "x" and "y".
_	As importantly for the school's development, the rule that limited applications to boys from Monmouthshire and the neighbouring counties was set aside, and applications were opened to the entirety of Wales and England.
_	OBA enforces the rule that Oklahoma lawyers must complete 12 credits of Continuing Legal Education every year.
_	A second exception to the rule that a person must be dead can be found in the case of estate massing.
_	Despite the tickets being free, some people often attempt to sell them on eBay, and in recent years this has meant that various security measures have been introduced, most notably the barcodes on tickets which are scanned at the gate, the rule that the person whose name is registered on the ticket has to be in attendance and, from 2012, passport-style pictures being required as part of the application process.
